329 | gas (noun): a fuel that burns with a blue flame | loc: газ
  EN TS: The gas flame is blue.
  ua TS: Полум'я газу синє.
  EN FS: The gas flame is green.
  ua FS: Полум'я газу зелене.
  EN TP: a blue gas flame
  ua TP: синє полум'я газу
  EN FP: gas in a car
  ua FP: газ в автомобілі
330 | gate (noun): the door where you get on a plane | loc: гейт
  EN TS: Just in time for the gate!
  ua TS: Якраз вчасно до гейту!
  EN FS: Too late for the gate!
  ua FS: Уже запізно до гейту!
  EN TP: running to the gate
  ua TP: біг до гейту
  EN FP: a gate in a garden
  ua FP: хвіртка в саду
331 | gentleman (noun): a polite, well-mannered man | loc: джентльмен
  EN TS: A gentleman is saving the oranges!
  ua TS: Джентльмен рятує апельсини!
  EN FS: A gentleman is saving the apples!
  ua FS: Джентльмен рятує яблука!
  EN TP: a gentleman with an umbrella
  ua TP: джентльмен із парасолькою
  EN FP: a gentleman with a dog
  ua FP: джентльмен із собакою
332 | giraffe (noun): a very tall animal with a long neck | loc: жирафа
  EN TS: The giraffe is having lunch.
  ua TS: Жирафа обідає.
  EN FS: The lion is having lunch.
  ua FS: Лев обідає.
  EN TP: a giraffe eating leaves
  ua TP: жирафа, що їсть листя
  EN FP: a giraffe eating grass
  ua FP: жирафа, що їсть траву
333 | girl (noun): a female child or a young woman | loc: дівчина
  EN TS: This girl can do everything!
  ua TS: Ця дівчина вміє все!
  EN FS: This boy can do everything!
  ua FS: Цей хлопець уміє все!
  EN TP: a girl skipping rope
  ua TP: дівчина стрибає через скакалку
  EN FP: a girl skipping school
  ua FP: дівчина прогулює школу
334 | glass (noun): a see-through cup for cold drinks | loc: склянка
  EN TS: Her glass is ice cold.
  ua TS: Її склянка крижана.
  EN FS: Her glass is hot.
  ua FS: Її склянка гаряча.
  EN TP: a glass of lemonade
  ua TP: склянка лимонаду
  EN FP: a glass of wine
  ua FP: склянка вина
336 | glasses (noun): a pair of lenses in a frame you wear to see | loc: окуляри
  EN TS: Glasses on, more ducks!
  ua TS: Окуляри надів — качок побільшало!
  EN FS: Glasses on, more geese!
  ua FS: Окуляри надів — гусей побільшало!
  EN TP: cleaning round glasses
  ua TP: протирати круглі окуляри
  EN FP: breaking round glasses
  ua FP: ламати круглі окуляри
338 | globe (noun): a small round model of the Earth on a stand | loc: глобус
  EN TS: She is hugging her globe!
  ua TS: Вона обіймає свій глобус!
  EN FS: She is hugging her lamp!
  ua FS: Вона обіймає свою лампу!
  EN TP: spinning a desk globe
  ua TP: крутити настільний глобус
  EN FP: drawing a globe
  ua FP: малювати глобус
339 | go (verb): to move from one place to another | loc: йти | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is going down the street.
  ua TS: Вона йде вниз вулицею.
  EN FS: She is going up the stairs.
  ua FS: Вона йде вгору сходами.
  EN TP: to go down the street
  ua TP: йти вниз вулицею
  EN FP: to go back home
  ua FP: йти назад додому
340 | goal (noun): the net that players kick the ball into | loc: ворота
  EN TS: They brought their own goal!
  ua TS: Вони принесли власні ворота!
  EN FS: They brought their own bench!
  ua FS: Вони принесли власну лавку!
  EN TP: a goal on the square
  ua TP: ворота на площі
  EN FP: a goal for next year
  ua FP: ціль на наступний рік
341 | goat (noun): a farm animal with horns that climbs well | loc: коза
  EN TS: The goat is eating laundry!
  ua TS: Коза їсть білизну!
  EN FS: The goat is eating flowers!
  ua FS: Коза їсть квіти!
  EN TP: a goat on a roof
  ua TP: коза на даху
  EN FP: a goat in a car
  ua FP: коза в машині
342 | goggles (noun): big glasses with a band that cover your eyes | loc: захисні окуляри
  EN TS: Goggles on, super tight!
  ua TS: Захисні окуляри вдягнуто, сидять як влиті!
  EN FS: Helmet on, super tight!
  ua FS: Шолом вдягнуто, сидить як влитий!
  EN TP: blue swim goggles
  ua TP: сині захисні окуляри для плавання
  EN FP: ski goggles in the snow
  ua FP: лижні окуляри на снігу
343 | grab (verb): to take hold of something quickly and firmly | loc: хапати | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She grabbed the ring!
  ua TS: Вона схопила каблучку!
  EN FS: She grabbed the coin!
  ua FS: Вона схопила монетку!
  EN TP: grabbing a ring underwater
  ua TP: хапати каблучку під водою
  EN FP: grabbing the pool ladder
  ua FP: хапатися за драбинку басейну
344 | gold (noun): a precious yellow metal worth a lot | loc: золото
  EN TS: She loves gold a bit too much.
  ua TS: Вона трохи занадто любить золото.
  EN FS: She loves cats a bit too much.
  ua FS: Вона трохи занадто любить котів.
  EN TP: a heavy gold bar
  ua TP: важкий злиток золота
  EN FP: a gold medal
  ua FP: золота медаль
346 | golf (noun): a game of hitting a small ball into holes | loc: гольф
  EN TS: Golf ball in the hole. Yes!
  ua TS: М'яч для гольфу в лунці. Так!
  EN FS: Golf ball in the water. Yes!
  ua FS: М'яч для гольфу у воді. Так!
  EN TP: a golf putt at sunset
  ua TP: удар у гольфі на заході сонця
  EN FP: a golf ball in water
  ua FP: м'яч для гольфу у воді
347 | gossip (noun): juicy talk about other people's private lives | loc: плітки
  EN TS: They love a bit of gossip.
  ua TS: Трохи пліток — і вони щасливі.
  EN FS: They love a bit of football.
  ua FS: Трохи футболу — і вони щасливі.
  EN TP: whispering juicy gossip
  ua TP: шепотіти соковиті плітки
  EN FP: gossip in a magazine
  ua FP: плітки в журналі
348 | government (noun): the group of people who officially rule a country | loc: уряд
  EN TS: The government voted yes.
  ua TS: Уряд проголосував «за».
  EN FS: The government voted no.
  ua FS: Уряд проголосував «проти».
  EN TP: a government vote
  ua TP: голосування уряду
  EN FP: a student government
  ua FP: студентське самоврядування
349 | grandfather (noun): the father of your mother or father | loc: дідусь
  EN TS: Fishing, chess and a hug: best grandfather ever.
  ua TS: Риболовля, шахи й обійми: найкращий дідусь у світі.
  EN FS: Fishing, chess and a hug: best grandmother ever.
  ua FS: Риболовля, шахи й обійми: найкраща бабуся у світі.
  EN TP: a grandfather and grandson
  ua TP: дідусь і онук
  EN FP: a grandfather and his dog
  ua FP: дідусь і його пес
350 | grandson (noun): the son of your son or daughter | loc: онук
  EN TS: Her grandson is home!
  ua TS: Її онук удома!
  EN FS: Her husband is home!
  ua FS: Її чоловік удома!
  EN TP: hugging her grandson
  ua TP: обіймати онука
  EN FP: hugging her husband
  ua FP: обіймати чоловіка
351 | grass (noun): the green plants that cover lawns and fields | loc: трава
  EN TS: They're chilling on the grass.
  ua TS: Вони чілять на траві.
  EN FS: They're chilling on the sand.
  ua FS: Вони чілять на піску.
  EN TP: lying on the soft grass
  ua TP: лежати на м'якій траві
  EN FP: cutting the soft grass
  ua FP: косити м'яку траву
352 | grill (noun): a metal frame for cooking food over heat | loc: гриль
  EN TS: The cheese has grill stripes.
  ua TS: На сирі смужки від гриля.
  EN FS: The bread has grill stripes.
  ua FS: На хлібі смужки від гриля.
  EN TP: cheese on a hot grill
  ua TP: сир на гарячому грилі
  EN FP: fish on a hot grill
  ua FP: риба на гарячому грилі
353 | guest (noun): a person you invite to your home | loc: гість
  EN TS: The guest arrived with a gift.
  ua TS: Гість прийшов із подарунком.
  EN FS: The guest arrived with a dog.
  ua FS: Гість прийшов із собакою.
  EN TP: welcoming a guest
  ua TP: зустрічати гостя
  EN FP: a guest room
  ua FP: кімната для гостей
354 | guidebook (noun): a book with facts and photos for tourists | loc: путівник
  EN TS: The guidebook got it right!
  ua TS: Путівник таки мав рацію!
  EN FS: The map got it right!
  ua FS: Мапа таки мала рацію!
  EN TP: a thick guidebook
  ua TP: товстий путівник
  EN FP: a thick phone book
  ua FP: товстий телефонний довідник
355 | guilt (noun): the bad feeling after doing something wrong | loc: почуття провини
  EN TS: He can't eat. Guilt!
  ua TS: Він не може їсти. Почуття провини!
  EN FS: He can't sleep. Guilt!
  ua FS: Він не може спати. Почуття провини!
  EN TP: guilt over a broken jug
  ua TP: почуття провини через розбитий глечик
  EN FP: guilt over a broken phone
  ua FP: почуття провини через розбитий телефон
356 | gym (noun): a place with machines where you work out | loc: спортзал
  EN TS: She will live in this gym now.
  ua TS: Тепер вона житиме в цьому спортзалі.
  EN FS: She will live in this pub now.
  ua FS: Тепер вона житиме в цьому пабі.
  EN TP: a bright new gym
  ua TP: світлий новий спортзал
  EN FP: gym class at school
  ua FP: урок фізкультури в школі
357 | hairbrush (noun): a tool for making your hair smooth and tidy | loc: щітка для волосся
  EN TS: Her hairbrush is a microphone!
  ua TS: Її щітка для волосся — мікрофон!
  EN FS: Her comb is a microphone!
  ua FS: Її гребінець — мікрофон!
  EN TP: a wooden hairbrush
  ua TP: дерев'яна щітка для волосся
  EN FP: a hairbrush for a horse
  ua FP: щітка для кінської гриви
358 | hammer (noun): a tool for hitting nails | loc: молоток
  EN TS: Careful work with that hammer.
  ua TS: Яка акуратна робота молотком.
  EN FS: Careful work with that spoon.
  ua FS: Яка акуратна робота ложкою.
  EN TP: a hammer on a nail
  ua TP: молоток на цвяху
  EN FP: a hammer in a toolbox
  ua FP: молоток в ящику з інструментами
359 | hamster (noun): a small furry pet that runs in a wheel | loc: хом'як
  EN TS: Full cheeks, happy hamster.
  ua TS: Повні щоки — щасливий хом'як.
  EN FS: Empty cheeks, happy hamster.
  ua FS: Порожні щоки — щасливий хом'як.
  EN TP: a hamster in a wheel
  ua TP: хом'як у колесі
  EN FP: a hamster in a ball
  ua FP: хом'як у кулі
360 | hand sanitizer (noun): a gel that kills germs on your skin | loc: антисептик для рук
  EN TS: Hand sanitizer, then samosas.
  ua TS: Спершу антисептик для рук, потім самоси.
  EN FS: Hand cream, then samosas.
  ua FS: Спершу крем для рук, потім самоси.
  EN TP: a pump of hand sanitizer
  ua TP: пшик антисептика для рук
  EN FP: hand sanitizer at a door
  ua FP: антисептик для рук біля дверей
361 | wrap (verb): to cover something in paper or material | loc: загортати
  EN TS: No flowers? Just wrap lollipops.
  ua TS: Квітів немає? Просто загорни льодяники.
  EN FS: No flowers? Just wrap biscuits.
  ua FS: Квітів немає? Просто загорни печиво.
  EN TP: wrapping lollipops in paper
  ua TP: загортати льодяники в папір
  EN FP: wrapping biscuits in paper
  ua FP: загортати печиво в папір
362 | happy (adjective): feeling good and full of joy | loc: щасливий
  EN TS: She is so happy it's unreal.
  ua TS: Вона така щаслива, що аж не віриться.
  EN FS: She is so sad it's unreal.
  ua FS: Вона така сумна, що аж не віриться.
  EN TP: a happy seaside walk
  ua TP: щаслива прогулянка біля моря
  EN FP: a happy birthday party
  ua FP: вечірка на день народження
363 | research (noun): careful study of sources to find information | loc: дослідження
  EN TS: He does research all night.
  ua TS: Він займається дослідженням усю ніч.
  EN FS: He does research all morning.
  ua FS: Він займається дослідженням увесь ранок.
  EN TP: doing research at night
  ua TP: дослідження вночі
  EN FP: doing research outdoors
  ua FP: дослідження просто неба
364 | artist (noun): a person who draws or paints pictures | loc: художник
  EN TS: He says he is not an artist.
  ua TS: Він каже, що він не художник.
  EN FS: He says he is a famous artist.
  ua FS: Він каже, що він відомий художник.
  EN TP: not an artist
  ua TP: зовсім не художник
  EN FP: an artist's big studio
  ua FP: велика студія художника
365 | headphones (noun): things you wear over your ears to hear music | loc: навушники
  EN TS: Her headphones are too loud!
  ua TS: Її навушники занадто гучні!
  EN FS: Her speakers are too loud!
  ua FS: Її колонки занадто гучні!
  EN TP: sharing the headphones
  ua TP: ділитися навушниками
  EN FP: fixing the headphones
  ua FP: лагодити навушники
366 | heal (verb): to become healthy again after an injury | loc: загоюватися | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Her arm has healed. Yes!
  ua TS: Її рука загоїлася. Ура!
  EN FS: Her leg has healed. Yes!
  ua FS: Її нога загоїлася. Ура!
  EN TP: a healed arm
  ua TP: загоєна рука
  EN FP: a healed leg
  ua FP: загоєна нога
367 | heat (noun): hot weather or a high temperature | loc: спека
  EN TS: Too much heat for an ice pop!
  ua TS: Для фруктового льоду забагато спеки!
  EN FS: Too much rain for an ice pop!
  ua FS: Для фруктового льоду забагато дощу!
  EN TP: the heat in a village
  ua TP: спека в селі
  EN FP: the heat of a fire
  ua FP: жар від вогнища
368 | helicopter (noun): an aircraft with spinning blades on top | loc: вертоліт
  EN TS: Delivery by helicopter? Cool!
  ua TS: Доставка вертольотом? Круто!
  EN FS: Delivery by drone? Cool!
  ua FS: Доставка дроном? Круто!
  EN TP: a red helicopter delivery
  ua TP: доставка червоним вертольотом
  EN FP: a helicopter on a ship
  ua FP: вертоліт на кораблі
369 | ride (verb): to sit on and control a bike, horse or motorbike | loc: їхати | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is riding a motorbike.
  ua TS: Він їде на мотоциклі.
  EN FS: He is riding a horse.
  ua FS: Він їде на коні.
  EN TP: to ride a sport motorbike
  ua TP: їхати на спортивному мотоциклі
  EN FP: to ride in a car
  ua FP: їхати в машині
370 | helmet (noun): a hard hat that protects your head | loc: шолом
  EN TS: The red helmet did its job.
  ua TS: Червоний шолом зробив свою справу.
  EN FS: The blue helmet did its job.
  ua FS: Синій шолом зробив свою справу.
  EN TP: a red skate helmet
  ua TP: червоний шолом для скейту
  EN FP: a helmet on a motorbike
  ua FP: шолом на мотоциклі
371 | herb (noun): a plant like basil used to flavour food | loc: трава
  EN TS: Fresh herbs for the pasta, yum.
  ua TS: Свіжі трави для пасти, смакота.
  EN FS: Fresh herbs for the pizza, yum.
  ua FS: Свіжі трави для піци, смакота.
  EN TP: fresh herbs from the window
  ua TP: свіжі трави з підвіконня
  EN FP: herb tea in a cup
  ua FP: трав'яний чай у чашці
372 | trick (noun): a clever skilful move done to impress | loc: трюк
  EN TS: He's doing tricks on a roof.
  ua TS: Він робить трюки на даху.
  EN FS: He's doing tricks on a beach.
  ua FS: Він робить трюки на пляжі.
  EN TP: doing tricks with a ball
  ua TP: трюки з м'ячем
  EN FP: doing tricks with cards
  ua FP: трюки з картами
373 | stadium (noun): a big sports ground with seats all around | loc: стадіон
  EN TS: A stadium full of red fans.
  ua TS: Стадіон, повний червоних фанатів.
  EN FS: A stadium full of blue fans.
  ua FS: Стадіон, повний синіх фанатів.
  EN TP: a packed football stadium
  ua TP: переповнений футбольний стадіон
  EN FP: an empty stadium at night
  ua FP: порожній стадіон уночі
374 | jog (verb): to run slowly at a steady pace for exercise | loc: бігати підтюпцем
  EN TS: He is jogging at dawn.
  ua TS: Він бігає підтюпцем на світанку.
  EN FS: He is cycling at dawn.
  ua FS: Він катається на велосипеді на світанку.
  EN TP: jogging on an empty road
  ua TP: бігати підтюпцем порожньою дорогою
  EN FP: jogging with a dog
  ua FP: бігати підтюпцем із собакою
375 | race car (noun): a very fast car built for racing on a track | loc: гоночний автомобіль
  EN TS: He looks cool in a race car.
  ua TS: Він так круто виглядає в гоночному автомобілі.
  EN FS: He looks cool in a taxi.
  ua FS: Він так круто виглядає в таксі.
  EN TP: a race car at sunrise
  ua TP: гоночний автомобіль на світанку
  EN FP: a race car at night
  ua FP: гоночний автомобіль уночі
376 | wilderness (noun): a wild natural area where nobody lives | loc: дика природа
  EN TS: Pure wilderness, no people.
  ua TS: Сама дика природа, ні душі.
  EN FS: Pure desert, no people.
  ua FS: Сама пустеля, ні душі.
  EN TP: a river in the wilderness
  ua TP: річка серед дикої природи
  EN FP: a road through the wilderness
  ua FP: дорога крізь дику природу
377 | perform (verb): to sing, dance or play in front of people | loc: виступати
  EN TS: She is performing in a studio.
  ua TS: Вона виступає в студії.
  EN FS: She is performing in a church.
  ua FS: Вона виступає в церкві.
  EN TP: performing like a music video
  ua TP: виступати як у кліпі
  EN FP: performing in a big stadium
  ua FP: виступати на великому стадіоні
378 | sunrise (noun): the moment when the sun comes up in the morning | loc: схід сонця
  EN TS: The sunrise is super golden.
  ua TS: Схід сонця максимально золотий.
  EN FS: The sunrise is super grey.
  ua FS: Схід сонця максимально сірий.
  EN TP: flying into the sunrise
  ua TP: летіти назустріч сходу сонця
  EN FP: waking up before sunrise
  ua FP: прокинутися до сходу сонця
379 | vlog (noun): a video diary someone films to share online | loc: відеоблог
  EN TS: She is filming a vlog.
  ua TS: Вона знімає відеоблог.
  EN FS: She is filming a wedding.
  ua FS: Вона знімає весілля.
  EN TP: filming a morning vlog
  ua TP: знімати ранковий відеоблог
  EN FP: editing a travel vlog
  ua FP: монтувати відеоблог про подорожі
380 | journey (noun): traveling a long way from one place to another | loc: подорож
  EN TS: Her journey ended on a roof.
  ua TS: Її подорож закінчилася на даху.
  EN FS: Her journey ended on a boat.
  ua FS: Її подорож закінчилася на човні.
  EN TP: a long city journey
  ua TP: довга подорож містом
  EN FP: a journey by plane
  ua FP: подорож літаком
381 | scare (verb): to make someone feel afraid | loc: налякати
  EN TS: He is too scared to eat a grape.
  ua TS: Він надто наляканий, щоб з'їсти виноградину.
  EN FS: He is too scared to eat an apple.
  ua FS: Він надто наляканий, щоб з'їсти яблуко.
  EN TP: to scare a friend
  ua TP: налякати друга
  EN FP: to scare birds away
  ua FP: розлякати птахів
382 | high (adjective): far above the ground | loc: високий | translator note: adverb "so high" rephrased as a high workplace to keep the adjective
  EN TS: Wow, they work so high!
  ua TS: Ого, яке високе в них робоче місце!
  EN FS: Wow, they work so low!
  ua FS: Ого, яке низьке в них робоче місце!
  EN TP: high above the street
  ua TP: високо над вулицею
  EN FP: high on a mountain
  ua FP: високо в горах
383 | hiking (noun): walking a long way in nature for fun | loc: піші походи
  EN TS: Hiking all the way to the top!
  ua TS: Піший похід аж до самої вершини!
  EN FS: Skiing all the way to the top!
  ua FS: Лижний похід аж до самої вершини!
  EN TP: hiking up a mountain
  ua TP: піший похід у гори
  EN FP: hiking in the desert
  ua FP: піший похід пустелею
385 | hit (verb): to bring your hand or a bat hard against something | loc: вдарити
  EN TS: She hit it high into the sky!
  ua TS: Вона вдарила м'яч високо в небо!
  EN FS: She hit it low into the grass!
  ua FS: Вона вдарила м'яч низько в траву!
  EN TP: hitting the ball high
  ua TP: вдарити м'яч високо
  EN FP: hitting a ball into water
  ua FP: вдарити м'яч у воду
386 | hobby (noun): something you do for fun in your free time | loc: хобі
  EN TS: His hobby is building models.
  ua TS: Його хобі — будувати моделі.
  EN FS: His hobby is building houses.
  ua FS: Його хобі — будувати будинки.
  EN TP: a hobby with model ships
  ua TP: хобі з моделями кораблів
  EN FP: a hobby with real ships
  ua FP: хобі зі справжніми кораблями
387 | security camera (noun): a camera that films a home to keep it safe | loc: камера відеоспостереження
  EN TS: Security camera: the dog did it.
  ua TS: Камера відеоспостереження: це зробив пес.
  EN FS: Security camera: the cat did it.
  ua FS: Камера відеоспостереження: це зробив кіт.
  EN TP: night security camera footage
  ua TP: нічний запис камери відеоспостереження
  EN FP: a shop security camera
  ua FP: камера відеоспостереження в магазині
388 | homework (noun): tasks a teacher gives you to do after school | loc: домашнє завдання
  EN TS: Her homework never ends.
  ua TS: Її домашнє завдання ніколи не закінчується.
  EN FS: Her holiday never ends.
  ua FS: Її канікули ніколи не закінчуються.
  EN TP: homework late at night
  ua TP: домашнє завдання пізно вночі
  EN FP: homework on the bus
  ua FP: домашнє завдання в автобусі
389 | honey (noun): a sweet sticky food made by bees | loc: мед
  EN TS: The honey is so slow!
  ua TS: Мед такий повільний!
  EN FS: The honey is so fast!
  ua FS: Мед такий швидкий!
  EN TP: honey on a wooden dipper
  ua TP: мед на дерев'яній ложці
  EN FP: honey in tea
  ua FP: мед у чаї
390 | hoodie (noun): a soft sweatshirt with a hood on the back | loc: худі
  EN TS: His hoodie is super cozy.
  ua TS: Його худі суперзатишне.
  EN FS: His jacket is super cozy.
  ua FS: Його куртка суперзатишна.
  EN TP: pulling up a hoodie
  ua TP: натягнути худі
  EN FP: washing a hoodie
  ua FP: прати худі
391 | hope (noun): a feeling that something good will happen | loc: надія
  EN TS: The boat is back. Hope wins!
  ua TS: Човен повернувся. Надія перемагає!
  EN FS: The plane is back. Hope wins!
  ua FS: Літак повернувся. Надія перемагає!
  EN TP: hope for the boat
  ua TP: надія на повернення човна
  EN FP: hope for good weather
  ua FP: надія на гарну погоду
392 | horse (noun): a large animal people ride | loc: кінь | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is riding the horse.
  ua TS: Вона їде верхи на коні.
  EN FS: She is riding the camel.
  ua FS: Вона їде верхи на верблюді.
  EN TP: a horse and its rider
  ua TP: кінь і вершник
  EN FP: a horse and its cart
  ua FP: кінь і віз
393 | hostel (noun): a cheap place to sleep in shared rooms | loc: хостел
  EN TS: A hostel bed costs ten euros.
  ua TS: Ліжко в хостелі коштує десять євро.
  EN FS: A hostel bed costs six euros.
  ua FS: Ліжко в хостелі коштує шість євро.
  EN TP: a bunk in a hostel
  ua TP: двоярусне ліжко в хостелі
  EN FP: a room in a hotel
  ua FP: номер у готелі
394 | hot (adjective): having a high temperature | loc: спекотний
  EN TS: Too hot! He is hugging the fan.
  ua TS: Спекотний день! Він обіймає вентилятор.
  EN FS: Too hot! He is hugging the dog.
  ua FS: Спекотний день! Він обіймає пса.
  EN TP: a hot sunny day
  ua TP: спекотний сонячний день
  EN FP: a hot cup of tea
  ua FP: гаряча чашка чаю
395 | house (noun): a building where a family lives | loc: будинок
  EN TS: Best house in the whole world!
  ua TS: Найкращий будинок у всьому світі!
  EN FS: Best car in the whole world!
  ua FS: Найкраща машина у всьому світі!
  EN TP: moving into a yellow house
  ua TP: переїзд у жовтий будинок
  EN FP: moving into a white house
  ua FP: переїзд у білий будинок
396 | hug (noun): a close hold with your arms around someone | loc: обійми
  EN TS: That is the hug of the year!
  ua TS: Ось це обійми року!
  EN FS: That is the fight of the year!
  ua FS: Ось це бійка року!
  EN TP: a huge spinning hug
  ua TP: величезні обійми з кружлянням
  EN FP: a quick goodbye hug
  ua FP: швидкі обійми на прощання
397 | hunting (noun): following and trying to catch wild animals | loc: полювання
  EN TS: They are hunting in the forest.
  ua TS: Вони на полюванні в лісі.
  EN FS: They are hunting in the desert.
  ua FS: Вони на полюванні в пустелі.
  EN TP: hunting in an autumn forest
  ua TP: полювання в осінньому лісі
  EN FP: hunting in the snow
  ua FP: полювання в снігу
398 | hygiene (noun): keeping your body clean to stay healthy | loc: гігієна
  EN TS: Hygiene first, then thumbs up.
  ua TS: Спершу гігієна, потім великий палець угору.
  EN FS: Hygiene first, then high five.
  ua FS: Спершу гігієна, потім дай п'ять.
  EN TP: good hygiene in the bathroom
  ua TP: гігієна у ванній
  EN FP: good hygiene in the kitchen
  ua FP: гігієна на кухні
399 | ice cream (noun): a cold sweet frozen food made from milk | loc: морозиво
  EN TS: He is losing to his ice cream.
  ua TS: Він програє своєму морозиву.
  EN FS: He is losing to his hot dog.
  ua FS: Він програє своєму хот-догу.
  EN TP: melting ice cream
  ua TP: морозиво, що тане
  EN FP: ice cream in a cup
  ua FP: морозиво в стаканчику
400 | ice hockey (noun): a team game on frozen water with sticks and a puck | loc: хокей
  EN TS: Number 9 plays ice hockey.
  ua TS: Номер 9 грає в хокей.
  EN FS: Number 7 plays ice hockey.
  ua FS: Номер 7 грає в хокей.
  EN TP: ice hockey on a rink
  ua TP: хокей на ковзанці
  EN FP: ice hockey on a pond
  ua FP: хокей на ставку
401 | ice skates (noun): boots with blades for gliding on frozen water | loc: ковзани
  EN TS: Nice stop on those ice skates.
  ua TS: Гарне гальмування на цих ковзанах.
  EN FS: Nice stop on that snowboard.
  ua FS: Гарне гальмування на цьому сноуборді.
  EN TP: lacing up ice skates
  ua TP: шнурувати ковзани
  EN FP: ice skates on a shelf
  ua FP: ковзани на полиці
402 | ice (noun): water that has frozen hard | loc: лід | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is sliding on the ice.
  ua TS: Вона ковзає по льоду.
  EN FS: She is sliding on the grass.
  ua FS: Вона ковзає по траві.
  EN TP: bubbles in the ice
  ua TP: бульбашки в льоду
  EN FP: ice in a drink
  ua FP: лід у напої
404 | classroom (noun): a room where a teacher teaches students | loc: класна кімната
  EN TS: Chaos in the classroom, but he is calm.
  ua TS: У класній кімнаті хаос, а він спокійний.
  EN FS: Chaos in the kitchen, but he is calm.
  ua FS: На кухні хаос, а він спокійний.
  EN TP: a noisy classroom
  ua TP: галаслива класна кімната
  EN FP: a quiet classroom
  ua FP: тиха класна кімната
405 | inside (adverb): into or in a building or room | loc: всередині
  EN TS: Snow outside, friends inside.
  ua TS: Надворі сніг, всередині друзі.
  EN FS: Snow outside, dogs inside.
  ua FS: Надворі сніг, всередині собаки.
  EN TP: warm inside the cabin
  ua TP: тепло всередині хатинки
  EN FP: inside a tent
  ua FP: всередині намету
406 | iron (noun): the strong grey metal a blacksmith works with | loc: залізо
  EN TS: He is hammering hot iron.
  ua TS: Він кує гаряче залізо.
  EN FS: He is hammering hot glass.
  ua FS: Він кує гаряче скло.
  EN TP: hammering hot iron
  ua TP: кувати гаряче залізо
  EN FP: ironing a hot shirt
  ua FP: прасувати гарячу сорочку
407 | island (noun): a piece of land with water all around it | loc: острів
  EN TS: No way! A whole island for two!
  ua TS: Нічого собі! Цілий острів на двох!
  EN FS: No way! A whole island for ten!
  ua FS: Нічого собі! Цілий острів на десятьох!
  EN TP: a small tropical island
  ua TP: маленький тропічний острів
  EN FP: an island in a kitchen
  ua FP: острів на кухні
408 | jacket (noun): a short coat that covers your arms and top | loc: куртка
  EN TS: The jacket is on. Much better.
  ua TS: Куртку вдягнуто. Так набагато краще.
  EN FS: The scarf is on. Much better.
  ua FS: Шарф вдягнуто. Так набагато краще.
  EN TP: zipping up a brown jacket
  ua TP: застібати коричневу куртку
  EN FP: a jacket on a chair
  ua FP: куртка на стільці
410 | jam (noun): a sweet spread made from fruit and sugar | loc: джем
  EN TS: She is spreading jam thickly.
  ua TS: Вона щедро намазує джем.
  EN FS: She is spreading jam thinly.
  ua FS: Вона ледь-ледь намазує джем.
  EN TP: jam on toast
  ua TP: джем на тості
  EN FP: a traffic jam
  ua FP: затор на дорозі
411 | jealous (adjective): upset that someone else got what you wanted | loc: заздрісний
  EN TS: Wow, she is so jealous.
  ua TS: Ого, вона така заздрісна.
  EN FS: Wow, he is so jealous.
  ua FS: Ого, він такий заздрісний.
  EN TP: jealous of another dancer
  ua TP: заздрісна через іншу танцівницю
  EN FP: jealous of her teacher
  ua FP: заздрісна через учительку
412 | jersey (noun): a team sports shirt with a number on the back | loc: спортивна футболка
  EN TS: She got the number 7 jersey!
  ua TS: Їй дісталася спортивна футболка з номером 7!
  EN FS: She got the number 9 jersey!
  ua FS: Їй дісталася спортивна футболка з номером 9!
  EN TP: a new number 7 jersey
  ua TP: нова спортивна футболка №7
  EN FP: a new number 10 jersey
  ua FP: нова спортивна футболка №10
413 | juice (noun): the liquid you get by pressing fruit | loc: сік
  EN TS: The juice is ruby red.
  ua TS: Сік рубіново-червоний.
  EN FS: The juice is bright orange.
  ua FS: Сік яскраво-помаранчевий.
  EN TP: fresh pomegranate juice
  ua TP: свіжий гранатовий сік
  EN FP: orange juice in a box
  ua FP: апельсиновий сік у пакеті
414 | jump (verb): to push yourself off the ground into the air | loc: стрибати
  EN TS: He jumped over the bar!
  ua TS: Він стрибнув через планку!
  EN FS: He jumped over the fence!
  ua FS: Він стрибнув через паркан!
  EN TP: to jump over the bar
  ua TP: стрибати через планку
  EN FP: to jump into the pool
  ua FP: стрибати в басейн
415 | kangaroo (noun): an Australian animal that hops on big back legs | loc: кенгуру
  EN TS: This kangaroo has a passenger.
  ua TS: У цього кенгуру є пасажир.
  EN FS: This koala has a passenger.
  ua FS: У цієї коали є пасажир.
  EN TP: a kangaroo with a joey
  ua TP: кенгуру з кенгуреням
  EN FP: a kangaroo with boxing gloves
  ua FP: кенгуру в боксерських рукавичках
416 | ketchup (noun): a thick red tomato sauce for fries | loc: кетчуп
  EN TS: The ketchup finally gave up!
  ua TS: Кетчуп нарешті здався!
  EN FS: The mustard finally gave up!
  ua FS: Гірчиця нарешті здалася!
  EN TP: ketchup on fries
  ua TP: кетчуп на картоплі фрі
  EN FP: ketchup on a burger
  ua FP: кетчуп на бургері
418 | keychain (noun): a small ring or charm that holds your keys | loc: брелок
  EN TS: She made her own keychain.
  ua TS: Вона сама зробила собі брелок.
  EN FS: She made her own necklace.
  ua FS: Вона сама зробила собі намисто.
  EN TP: a keychain with a pompom
  ua TP: брелок із помпоном
  EN FP: a keychain with a photo
  ua FP: брелок із фото
419 | kick (verb): to hit something with your foot | loc: бити ногою
  EN TS: They are kicking a ball.
  ua TS: Вони б'ють м'яч ногою.
  EN FS: They are throwing a ball.
  ua FS: Вони кидають м'яч.
  EN TP: kicking a ball around
  ua TP: бити м'яч ногою
  EN FP: kicking a door open
  ua FP: вибити двері ногою
422 | kicking (noun): hitting something again and again with your foot | loc: удари ногами
  EN TS: Her kicking is super high.
  ua TS: Її удари ногами супервисокі.
  EN FS: Her kicking is super low.
  ua FS: Її удари ногами супернизькі.
  EN TP: kicking a punching bag
  ua TP: удари ногами по боксерській груші
  EN FP: kicking a football
  ua FP: удари ногами по футбольному м'ячу
423 | kiss (verb): to touch someone with your lips to show love | loc: цілувати | checker: word_missing? | translator note: "caught her kiss" rephrased so the verb цілувати appears; roles swapped as in English
  EN TS: He caught her kiss!
  ua TS: Вона цілує долоню й дмухає — він ловить!
  EN FS: She caught his kiss!
  ua FS: Він цілує долоню й дмухає — вона ловить!
  EN TP: blowing a kiss
  ua TP: посилати повітряний поцілунок
  EN FP: a goodnight kiss
  ua FP: поцілунок на добраніч
424 | knife (noun): a tool with a sharp blade for cutting | loc: ніж
  EN TS: His knife is cutting bread.
  ua TS: Його ніж ріже хліб.
  EN FS: His knife is cutting cheese.
  ua FS: Його ніж ріже сир.
  EN TP: a large bread knife
  ua TP: великий ніж для хліба
  EN FP: a small pocket knife
  ua FP: маленький кишеньковий ніж
426 | ladder (noun): a set of steps you lean on a wall to climb | loc: драбина
  EN TS: She is climbing; he is just holding the ladder.
  ua TS: Вона лізе, а він лише тримає драбину.
  EN FS: She is climbing; he is just holding the basket.
  ua FS: Вона лізе, а він лише тримає кошик.
  EN TP: holding the ladder steady
  ua TP: тримати драбину рівно
  EN FP: painting the ladder
  ua FP: фарбувати драбину
427 | ladybug (noun): a small red beetle with black spots | loc: сонечко
  EN TS: The ladybug is flying away.
  ua TS: Сонечко відлітає.
  EN FS: The ladybug is eating a leaf.
  ua FS: Сонечко їсть листок.
  EN TP: a ladybug on the grass
  ua TP: сонечко на траві
  EN FP: a ladybug on a hand
  ua FP: сонечко на руці
428 | lake (noun): a large area of water with land all around it | loc: озеро
  EN TS: A canoe on a calm lake.
  ua TS: Каное на спокійному озері.
  EN FS: A canoe on a calm sea.
  ua FS: Каное на спокійному морі.
  EN TP: a calm mountain lake
  ua TP: спокійне гірське озеро
  EN FP: a frozen lake
  ua FP: замерзле озеро
429 | land (verb): to come down to the ground after flying | loc: приземлятися
  EN TS: She landed it perfectly!
  ua TS: Вона ідеально приземлилася!
  EN FS: She landed in the water!
  ua FS: Вона приземлилася у воду!
  EN TP: landing on a grassy field
  ua TP: приземлятися на трав'яне поле
  EN FP: landing a plane
  ua FP: приземлити літак
430 | language (noun): the words people use to speak and write | loc: мова
  EN TS: He is teaching her his language.
  ua TS: Він вчить її своєї мови.
  EN FS: She is teaching him her language.
  ua FS: Вона вчить його своєї мови.
  EN TP: learning a new language
  ua TP: вивчати нову мову
  EN FP: a language app lesson
  ua FP: урок у мовному застосунку
431 | lazy (adjective): not wanting to work or make any effort | loc: лінивий
  EN TS: Lazy? No, he is a "genius".
  ua TS: Лінивий? Ні, він «геній».
  EN FS: Lazy? No, she is a "genius".
  ua FS: Лінива? Ні, вона «геній».
  EN TP: a lazy man at home
  ua TP: лінивий чоловік удома
  EN FP: a lazy cat at home
  ua FP: лінивий кіт удома
432 | lead (verb): to go in front and show others the way | loc: вести | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She's leading with a lantern.
  ua TS: Вона веде всіх із ліхтарем.
  EN FS: She's leading with a torch.
  ua FS: Вона веде всіх із кишеньковим ліхтариком.
  EN TP: leading hikers with a lantern
  ua TP: вести туристів із ліхтарем
  EN FP: leading hikers with a map
  ua FP: вести туристів із мапою
435 | leather (noun): animal skin used to make shoes, bags and jackets | loc: шкіра
  EN TS: The leather is creaking!
  ua TS: Шкіра скрипить!
  EN FS: The floor is creaking!
  ua FS: Підлога скрипить!
  EN TP: stretching leather
  ua TP: розтягувати шкіру
  EN FP: a leather sofa
  ua FP: шкіряний диван
436 | left (adverb): toward the side where your heart is | loc: ліворуч
  EN TS: Everyone is stepping left.
  ua TS: Усі крокують ліворуч.
  EN FS: Everyone is stepping right.
  ua FS: Усі крокують праворуч.
  EN TP: to step to the left
  ua TP: крок ліворуч
  EN FP: to jump to the left
  ua FP: стрибок ліворуч
437 | leg (noun): one of the long body parts you walk on | loc: нога
  EN TS: She is stretching her leg.
  ua TS: Вона розтягує ногу.
  EN FS: She is stretching her arm.
  ua FS: Вона розтягує руку.
  EN TP: a leg on the wall
  ua TP: нога на стіні
  EN FP: a leg in a cast
  ua FP: нога в гіпсі
438 | lemon (noun): a sour yellow fruit | loc: лимон
  EN TS: The lemon is way too sour!
  ua TS: Лимон аж надто кислий!
  EN FS: The lemon is way too sweet!
  ua FS: Лимон аж надто солодкий!
  EN TP: biting a lemon wedge
  ua TP: кусати часточку лимона
  EN FP: a lemon cake
  ua FP: лимонний торт
439 | lemonade (noun): a cold sweet drink made with sour yellow fruit | loc: лимонад
  EN TS: The lemonade is super cold.
  ua TS: Лимонад суперхолодний.
  EN FS: The lemonade is super hot.
  ua FS: Лимонад супергарячий.
  EN TP: a jar of lemonade
  ua TP: слоїк лимонаду
  EN FP: a can of lemonade
  ua FP: бляшанка лимонаду
440 | lifting (noun): raising something heavy up off the ground | loc: піднімання
  EN TS: He is lifting a barbell!
  ua TS: Ось це піднімання штанги!
  EN FS: He is lifting a sofa!
  ua FS: Ось це піднімання дивана!
  EN TP: lifting a heavy barbell
  ua TP: піднімання важкої штанги
  EN FP: lifting a small child
  ua FP: піднімання маленької дитини
442 | teamwork (noun): people working together to get something done | loc: командна робота
  EN TS: Teamwork beats one heavy box.
  ua TS: Командна робота перемагає важку коробку.
  EN FS: Teamwork beats one heavy sofa.
  ua FS: Командна робота перемагає важкий диван.
  EN TP: teamwork with a heavy box
  ua TP: командна робота з важкою коробкою
  EN FP: teamwork on a football pitch
  ua FP: командна робота на футбольному полі
443 | light (noun): the brightness that lets you see things | loc: світло
  EN TS: Finally, light in the attic!
  ua TS: Нарешті світло на горищі!
  EN FS: Finally, light in the kitchen!
  ua FS: Нарешті світло на кухні!
  EN TP: light through the window
  ua TP: світло крізь вікно
  EN FP: light from a candle
  ua FP: світло від свічки
444 | lightning (noun): the bright electric flash in a storm sky | loc: блискавка
  EN TS: Lightning! Did you see that?
  ua TS: Блискавка! Ти це бачив?
  EN FS: Rainbow! Did you see that?
  ua FS: Веселка! Ти це бачив?
  EN TP: watching lightning at night
  ua TP: дивитися на блискавку вночі
  EN FP: lightning in the daytime
  ua FP: блискавка вдень
445 | line (noun): a long thin mark on a surface | loc: лінія
  EN TS: Her white line is perfect!
  ua TS: Її біла лінія ідеальна!
  EN FS: Her yellow line is perfect!
  ua FS: Її жовта лінія ідеальна!
  EN TP: painting a white line
  ua TP: малювати білу лінію
  EN FP: a line of people
  ua FP: черга людей
446 | lion (noun): a big wild cat with a mane that roars | loc: лев
  EN TS: The lion is roaring at us!
  ua TS: Лев гарчить на нас!
  EN FS: The lion is running at us!
  ua FS: Лев біжить на нас!
  EN TP: a lion in the grass
  ua TP: лев у траві
  EN FP: a lion in a cage
  ua FP: лев у клітці
447 | lip balm (noun): a stick of cream that keeps your mouth soft | loc: бальзам для губ
  EN TS: Lip balm saves the day!
  ua TS: Бальзам для губ рятує ситуацію!
  EN FS: Hand cream saves the day!
  ua FS: Крем для рук рятує ситуацію!
  EN TP: putting on lip balm
  ua TP: наносити бальзам для губ
  EN FP: buying a lip balm
  ua FP: купувати бальзам для губ
448 | lip gloss (noun): shiny liquid makeup painted on the lips | loc: блиск для губ
  EN TS: Lip gloss as shiny as glass.
  ua TS: Блиск для губ сяє, як скло.
  EN FS: Lip gloss as matte as paper.
  ua FS: Блиск для губ матовий, як папір.
  EN TP: shiny pink lip gloss
  ua TP: сяйний рожевий блиск для губ
  EN FP: dark red lip gloss
  ua FP: темно-червоний блиск для губ
449 | listening (noun): paying attention to sounds you hear | loc: слухання | translator note: "they are listening/sleeping" rephrased as a mode to keep the noun слухання
  EN TS: Shh, they are listening!
  ua TS: Тсс, режим слухання!
  EN FS: Shh, they are sleeping!
  ua FS: Тсс, режим сну!
  EN TP: listening in the forest
  ua TP: слухання лісу
  EN FP: listening to music
  ua FP: слухання музики
450 | lizard (noun): a small reptile with four legs and a long tail | loc: ящірка
  EN TS: The lizard is sunbathing.
  ua TS: Ящірка засмагає.
  EN FS: The lizard is swimming.
  ua FS: Ящірка плаває.
  EN TP: a lizard on a wall
  ua TP: ящірка на стіні
  EN FP: a lizard in a box
  ua FP: ящірка в коробці
451 | lock (verb): to close something with a key | loc: замкнути | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is locking the door.
  ua TS: Вона замикає двері.
  EN FS: She is opening the door.
  ua FS: Вона відчиняє двері.
  EN TP: locking a boat door
  ua TP: замкнути двері човна
  EN FP: locking a car door
  ua FP: замкнути двері авто
452 | logo (noun): the small symbol that represents a company | loc: логотип
  EN TS: They even put the logo on the dog!
  ua TS: Вони навіть на пса наліпили логотип!
  EN FS: They even put the logo on the cat!
  ua FS: Вони навіть на кота наліпили логотип!
  EN TP: a logo on a collar
  ua TP: логотип на нашийнику
  EN FP: a logo on a T-shirt
  ua FP: логотип на футболці
453 | lonely (adjective): sad because you are all alone | loc: самотній
  EN TS: He is lonely in the cafeteria.
  ua TS: Він самотній у їдальні.
  EN FS: He is lonely in the library.
  ua FS: Він самотній у бібліотеці.
  EN TP: a lonely lunch
  ua TP: самотній обід
  EN FP: a lonely walk home
  ua FP: самотня дорога додому
454 | love (noun): a strong feeling of caring for someone | loc: любов
  EN TS: Soup and a blanket: pure love.
  ua TS: Суп і плед: чиста любов.
  EN FS: Tea and a blanket: pure love.
  ua FS: Чай і плед: чиста любов.
  EN TP: love on a rainy night
  ua TP: любов дощової ночі
  EN FP: love at first sight
  ua FP: любов з першого погляду
455 | lungs (noun): the two organs in your chest you breathe with | loc: легені
  EN TS: She has super strong lungs.
  ua TS: У неї суперсильні легені.
  EN FS: He has super strong lungs.
  ua FS: У нього суперсильні легені.
  EN TP: lungs full of air
  ua TP: легені, повні повітря
  EN FP: lungs full of smoke
  ua FP: легені, повні диму
456 | magazine (noun): a thin paper book with photos, printed monthly | loc: журнал
  EN TS: The magazine is hers now.
  ua TS: Тепер журнал її.
  EN FS: The newspaper is hers now.
  ua FS: Тепер газета її.
  EN TP: flipping through a magazine
  ua TP: гортати журнал
  EN FP: a magazine on a train
  ua FP: журнал у потязі
457 | makeup (noun): creams and colours put on the face to look good | loc: макіяж
  EN TS: An artist is doing her makeup.
  ua TS: Візажист робить їй макіяж.
  EN FS: An artist is doing her hair.
  ua FS: Візажист робить їй зачіску.
  EN TP: doing makeup at a mirror
  ua TP: робити макіяж перед дзеркалом
  EN FP: removing makeup at a mirror
  ua FP: знімати макіяж перед дзеркалом
458 | man (noun): an adult male person | loc: чоловік
  EN TS: A big man is carrying a crate.
  ua TS: Здоровий чоловік несе ящик.
  EN FS: A big man is carrying a dog.
  ua FS: Здоровий чоловік несе пса.
  EN TP: men playing chess
  ua TP: чоловіки грають у шахи
  EN FP: men playing cards
  ua FP: чоловіки грають у карти
459 | manager (noun): the person in charge who tells a team what to do | loc: менеджер
  EN TS: The manager is giving orders.
  ua TS: Менеджер роздає накази.
  EN FS: The manager is giving flowers.
  ua FS: Менеджер роздає квіти.
  EN TP: a manager with a clipboard
  ua TP: менеджер із планшетом
  EN FP: a football team manager
  ua FP: менеджер футбольної команди
461 | mannequin (noun): a life-size dummy that displays clothes in a shop | loc: манекен
  EN TS: He is copying the mannequin. Twins!
  ua TS: Він копіює манекен. Близнюки!
  EN FS: He is painting the mannequin. Twins!
  ua FS: Він фарбує манекен. Близнюки!
  EN TP: dressing a mannequin
  ua TP: вдягати манекен
  EN FP: a mannequin in a window
  ua FP: манекен у вітрині
462 | map (noun): a drawing of an area that shows roads and places | loc: карта
  EN TS: The map found the fountain!
  ua TS: Карта знайшла фонтан!
  EN FS: The map found the church!
  ua FS: Карта знайшла церкву!
  EN TP: a big paper map
  ua TP: велика паперова карта
  EN FP: a map on a phone
  ua FP: карта в телефоні
464 | marker (noun): a pen with a thick soft tip | loc: маркер
  EN TS: She is drawing with a marker.
  ua TS: Вона малює маркером.
  EN FS: She is drawing with chalk.
  ua FS: Вона малює крейдою.
  EN TP: a thick pink marker
  ua TP: товстий рожевий маркер
  EN FP: a marker on a whiteboard
  ua FP: маркер на білій дошці
465 | market (noun): a place where people buy and sell food and goods | loc: ринок
  EN TS: She is shopping at a market.
  ua TS: Вона робить покупки на ринку.
  EN FS: She is shopping at a mall.
  ua FS: Вона робить покупки в торговому центрі.
  EN TP: a busy street market
  ua TP: людний вуличний ринок
  EN FP: a busy street party
  ua FP: людна вулична вечірка
466 | mascara (noun): dark makeup brushed onto the eyelashes | loc: туш для вій
  EN TS: The mascara face: mouth wide open.
  ua TS: Туш для вій — і рот одразу навстіж.
  EN FS: The mascara face: eyes shut tight.
  ua FS: Туш для вій — і очі одразу заплющені.
  EN TP: brushing on black mascara
  ua TP: наносити чорну туш для вій
  EN FP: mascara running down cheeks
  ua FP: туш для вій тече по щоках
467 | master (noun): a person with great skill others learn from | loc: майстер
  EN TS: The master is shaping a vase.
  ua TS: Майстер формує вазу.
  EN FS: The master is painting a vase.
  ua FS: Майстер розписує вазу.
  EN TP: a pottery master
  ua TP: майстер гончарства
  EN FP: a master at the piano
  ua FP: майстер за фортепіано
468 | mat (noun): a soft flat piece you lie or stand on | loc: килимок
  EN TS: They are on their yoga mats.
  ua TS: Вони на своїх килимках для йоги.
  EN FS: They are on their towels.
  ua FS: Вони на своїх рушниках.
  EN TP: a purple yoga mat
  ua TP: фіолетовий килимок для йоги
  EN FP: a mat at the door
  ua FP: килимок біля дверей
469 | matches (noun): small sticks that make fire when struck | loc: сірники
  EN TS: These matches work first time!
  ua TS: Ці сірники спрацьовують з першого разу!
  EN FS: This lighter works first time!
  ua FS: Ця запальничка спрацьовує з першого разу!
  EN TP: a box of matches
  ua TP: коробка сірників
  EN FP: matches on television
  ua FP: матчі по телевізору
470 | meadow (noun): a field of wild grass and flowers | loc: луг
  EN TS: They fell into the meadow.
  ua TS: Вони гепнулися просто на луг.
  EN FS: They fell into the river.
  ua FS: Вони гепнулися просто в річку.
  EN TP: a meadow full of poppies
  ua TP: луг, повний маків
  EN FP: a meadow full of cows
  ua FP: луг, повний корів
471 | meat (noun): food that comes from animals | loc: м'ясо
  EN TS: The dog wants the meat.
  ua TS: Пес хоче м'ясо.
  EN FS: The cat wants the meat.
  ua FS: Кіт хоче м'ясо.
  EN TP: grilled meat on a board
  ua TP: м'ясо гриль на дошці
  EN FP: raw meat in a shop
  ua FP: сире м'ясо в магазині
472 | mechanic (noun): a person whose job is to fix cars | loc: механік
  EN TS: The mechanic is fixing a car.
  ua TS: Механік лагодить машину.
  EN FS: The mechanic is fixing a bike.
  ua FS: Механік лагодить велосипед.
  EN TP: a mechanic in a garage
  ua TP: механік у гаражі
  EN FP: a mechanic on the road
  ua FP: механік на дорозі
473 | medal (noun): a round metal prize you wear around your neck | loc: медаль
  EN TS: She is biting her gold medal. Real gold?
  ua TS: Вона кусає свою золоту медаль. Справжнє золото?
  EN FS: She is biting her gold ring. Real gold?
  ua FS: Вона кусає свою золоту каблучку. Справжнє золото?
  EN TP: biting a gold medal
  ua TP: кусати золоту медаль
  EN FP: a medal in a box
  ua FP: медаль у коробочці
474 | meditation (noun): sitting still and breathing to calm the mind | loc: медитація
  EN TS: Group meditation at sunset.
  ua TS: Групова медитація на заході сонця.
  EN FS: Group meditation on a beach.
  ua FS: Групова медитація на пляжі.
  EN TP: meditation on a wooden deck
  ua TP: медитація на дерев'яному настилі
  EN FP: meditation in a temple
  ua FP: медитація в храмі
475 | memory (noun): something from the past that you remember | loc: спогад
  EN TS: Each memory makes her smile.
  ua TS: Кожен спогад викликає в неї усмішку.
  EN FS: Each memory makes her cry.
  ua FS: Кожен спогад викликає в неї сльози.
  EN TP: a box of old memories
  ua TP: коробка старих спогадів
  EN FP: a camera memory card
  ua FP: карта пам'яті фотоапарата
476 | microscope (noun): a lens tool that makes tiny things look huge | loc: мікроскоп
  EN TS: He is using a microscope.
  ua TS: Він користується мікроскопом.
  EN FS: He is using a telescope.
  ua FS: Він користується телескопом.
  EN TP: a leaf under a microscope
  ua TP: листок під мікроскопом
  EN FP: a bug under a microscope
  ua FP: жучок під мікроскопом
477 | microwave (noun): a small box that heats food very fast | loc: мікрохвильовка
  EN TS: Microwave TV is the best show.
  ua TS: Мікрохвильовка — найкраще шоу по телику.
  EN FS: Oven TV is the best show.
  ua FS: Духовка — найкраще шоу по телику.
  EN TP: watching the microwave
  ua TP: дивитися на мікрохвильовку
  EN FP: cleaning the microwave
  ua FP: мити мікрохвильовку
478 | milk (noun): the white drink that comes from cows | loc: молоко
  EN TS: Everyone has a milk moustache!
  ua TS: У всіх вуса з молока!
  EN FS: Nobody has a milk moustache!
  ua FS: Ні в кого немає вусів з молока!
  EN TP: a milk moustache
  ua TP: вуса з молока
  EN FP: milk in the fridge
  ua FP: молоко в холодильнику
479 | mind (noun): the part of you that thinks and plans | loc: розум
  EN TS: Her mind is two moves ahead.
  ua TS: Її розум на два ходи попереду.
  EN FS: Her mind is two moves behind.
  ua FS: Її розум на два ходи позаду.
  EN TP: planning moves in her mind
  ua TP: планувати ходи в розумі
  EN FP: changing her mind
  ua FP: передумати
480 | mineral water (noun): bottled drink from a natural spring, often fizzy | loc: мінеральна вода
  EN TS: The mineral water tickles her.
  ua TS: Мінеральна вода її лоскоче.
  EN FS: The orange juice tickles her.
  ua FS: Апельсиновий сік її лоскоче.
  EN TP: fizzy mineral water
  ua TP: газована мінеральна вода
  EN FP: still mineral water
  ua FP: негазована мінеральна вода
481 | mirror (noun): a piece of glass where you see yourself | loc: дзеркало
  EN TS: The mirror loves him back.
  ua TS: Дзеркало теж його любить.
  EN FS: The window loves him back.
  ua FS: Вікно теж його любить.
  EN TP: flexing at the mirror
  ua TP: грати м'язами перед дзеркалом
  EN FP: cleaning the mirror
  ua FP: мити дзеркало
483 | monkey (noun): a clever animal with a long tail that climbs trees | loc: мавпа
  EN TS: The monkey stole a banana!
  ua TS: Мавпа вкрала банан!
  EN FS: The monkey stole a hat!
  ua FS: Мавпа вкрала капелюх!
  EN TP: a monkey eating a banana
  ua TP: мавпа їсть банан
  EN FP: a monkey selling a banana
  ua FP: мавпа продає банан
484 | mop (noun): a stick with soft strings to wash floors | loc: швабра
  EN TS: She is mopping the floor.
  ua TS: Вона миє підлогу шваброю.
  EN FS: She is sweeping the floor.
  ua FS: Вона підмітає підлогу віником.
  EN TP: a mop in a bucket
  ua TP: швабра у відрі
  EN FP: a mop of curly hair
  ua FP: копиця кучерявого волосся
485 | moss (noun): a soft green plant that carpets rocks and trees | loc: мох
  EN TS: The moss is soft. Nice pillow.
  ua TS: Мох м'який. Класна подушка.
  EN FS: The hay is soft. Nice pillow.
  ua FS: Сіно м'яке. Класна подушка.
  EN TP: soft green moss
  ua TP: м'який зелений мох
  EN FP: moss on a roof
  ua FP: мох на даху
486 | mountain (noun): a very high hill | loc: гора
  EN TS: Top of the mountain, yes!
  ua TS: Вершина гори, так!
  EN FS: Bottom of the mountain, yes!
  ua FS: Підніжжя гори, так!
  EN TP: on top of a mountain
  ua TP: на вершині гори
  EN FP: a mountain lake
  ua FP: гірське озеро
487 | mouse (noun): a small furry animal with a long tail | loc: миша
  EN TS: The mouse found the cheese.
  ua TS: Миша знайшла сир.
  EN FS: The mouse found the bread.
  ua FS: Миша знайшла хліб.
  EN TP: a mouse in a barn
  ua TP: миша в сараї
  EN FP: a mouse and a keyboard
  ua FP: мишка й клавіатура
488 | muscle (noun): a body part that makes you move and gives strength | loc: м'яз
  EN TS: His muscles are enormous!
  ua TS: У нього величезні м'язи!
  EN FS: His shoes are enormous!
  ua FS: У нього величезні черевики!
  EN TP: flexing big muscles
  ua TP: напружувати великі м'язи
  EN FP: a muscle in the leg
  ua FP: м'яз на нозі
489 | mushroom (noun): a fungus with a round cap on a short stem | loc: гриб
  EN TS: The mushroom has white spots.
  ua TS: У гриба білі цятки.
  EN FS: The mushroom has black spots.
  ua FS: У гриба чорні цятки.
  EN TP: a red mushroom with spots
  ua TP: червоний гриб у цятку
  EN FP: a red mushroom soup
  ua FP: суп із червоних грибів
490 | musician (noun): a person who plays an instrument or sings | loc: музикант
  EN TS: This musician will be famous.
  ua TS: Цей музикант стане відомим.
  EN FS: This dancer will be famous.
  ua FS: Цей танцюрист стане відомим.
  EN TP: a street musician
  ua TP: вуличний музикант
  EN FP: a musician in a band
  ua FP: музикант у гурті
491 | mustard (noun): a yellow spicy sauce you put on hot dogs | loc: гірчиця
  EN TS: The mustard is sharp.
  ua TS: Гірчиця гостра.
  EN FS: The honey is sharp.
  ua FS: Мед гострий.
  EN TP: a spoonful of mustard
  ua TP: ложка гірчиці
  EN FP: a jar of mustard seeds
  ua FP: банка гірчичного насіння
492 | nail polish (noun): coloured paint for your fingernails | loc: лак для нігтів
  EN TS: Her nail polish is still wet!
  ua TS: Її лак для нігтів ще мокрий!
  EN FS: Her hair is still wet!
  ua FS: Її волосся ще мокре!
  EN TP: painting nails with polish
  ua TP: фарбувати нігті лаком
  EN FP: removing old nail polish
  ua FP: знімати старий лак для нігтів
495 | nature (noun): the world of plants, water and mountains | loc: природа
  EN TS: They are relaxing in nature.
  ua TS: Вони відпочивають на природі.
  EN FS: They are running in nature.
  ua FS: Вони бігають на природі.
  EN TP: lying in nature
  ua TP: лежати на природі
  EN FP: a nature film
  ua FP: фільм про природу
496 | necklace (noun): a chain or string of beads worn around your neck | loc: намисто
  EN TS: Nice necklace, great choice.
  ua TS: Гарне намисто, чудовий вибір.
  EN FS: Nice bracelet, great choice.
  ua FS: Гарний браслет, чудовий вибір.
  EN TP: a colourful beaded necklace
  ua TP: барвисте намисто з бусин
  EN FP: a gold chain necklace
  ua FP: золотий ланцюжок
498 | nervous (adjective): worried and a bit scared about what will happen | loc: нервовий
  EN TS: So nervous before the show!
  ua TS: Нервовий момент перед шоу!
  EN FS: So nervous before the exam!
  ua FS: Нервовий момент перед іспитом!
  EN TP: a nervous guitar player
  ua TP: нервовий гітарист
  EN FP: a nervous student before exams
  ua FP: нервовий студент перед іспитами
499 | newspaper (noun): printed pages of news that come out daily | loc: газета
  EN TS: Peek-a-boo with a newspaper!
  ua TS: Ку-ку з газетою!
  EN FS: Peek-a-boo with a menu!
  ua FS: Ку-ку з меню!
  EN TP: hiding behind a newspaper
  ua TP: ховатися за газетою
  EN FP: reading a newspaper online
  ua FP: читати газету онлайн
500 | dribble (verb): to run with the ball at your feet past players | loc: дриблювати
  EN TS: He's dribbling past him like he's not there.
  ua TS: Він дриблює повз нього, наче того й немає.
  EN FS: He's dribbling past three men like they're not there.
  ua FS: Він дриблює повз трьох, наче їх і немає.
  EN TP: dribbling past a defender
  ua TP: дриблювати повз захисника
  EN FP: dribbling past the goalkeeper
  ua FP: дриблювати повз воротаря
501 | night (noun): the dark time between evening and morning | loc: ніч | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: They are walking at night.
  ua TS: Вони гуляють пізньої ночі.
  EN FS: They are walking at noon.
  ua FS: Вони гуляють опівдні.
  EN TP: walking home at night
  ua TP: йти додому серед ночі
  EN FP: working at night
  ua FP: працювати вночі
502 | north (noun): the direction toward the top of a map | loc: північ
  EN TS: They are heading north.
  ua TS: Вони прямують на північ.
  EN FS: They are heading south.
  ua FS: Вони прямують на південь.
  EN TP: heading north with a compass
  ua TP: на північ із компасом
  EN FP: the north of a city
  ua FP: північ міста
503 | notebook (noun): a book with empty pages for writing in | loc: зошит
  EN TS: A new notebook! Big moment.
  ua TS: Новий зошит! Великий момент.
  EN FS: A new laptop! Big moment.
  ua FS: Новий ноутбук! Великий момент.
  EN TP: a brand-new notebook
  ua TP: новенький зошит
  EN FP: a notebook full of notes
  ua FP: зошит, повний записів
505 | nut (noun): a dry fruit with a hard shell and a seed inside | loc: горіх
  EN TS: He is fighting a tiny nut.
  ua TS: Він воює з крихітним горіхом.
  EN FS: He is fighting a tiny egg.
  ua FS: Він воює з крихітним яйцем.
  EN TP: cracking a nut
  ua TP: розколювати горіх
  EN FP: a nut on a bolt
  ua FP: гайка на болті
506 | nutrition (noun): healthy food and what it gives your body | loc: харчування
  EN TS: Their plate is pure nutrition.
  ua TS: Їхня тарілка — суцільне правильне харчування.
  EN FS: Their plate is pure sugar.
  ua FS: Їхня тарілка — суцільний цукор.
  EN TP: a plate full of nutrition
  ua TP: тарілка правильного харчування
  EN FP: nutrition facts on a box
  ua FP: харчова цінність на коробці
507 | observe (verb): to watch something carefully to learn | loc: спостерігати
  EN TS: She is observing a dragonfly.
  ua TS: Вона спостерігає за бабкою.
  EN FS: She is observing a butterfly.
  ua FS: Вона спостерігає за метеликом.
  EN TP: observing a dragonfly
  ua TP: спостерігати за бабкою
  EN FP: catching a dragonfly
  ua FP: ловити бабку
508 | ocean (noun): the huge salt water that covers most of the earth | loc: океан
  EN TS: Dolphins in the ocean! No way!
  ua TS: Дельфіни в океані! Не може бути!
  EN FS: Sharks in the ocean! No way!
  ua FS: Акули в океані! Не може бути!
  EN TP: dolphins in the ocean
  ua TP: дельфіни в океані
  EN FP: swimming in the ocean
  ua FP: плавати в океані
509 | oil (noun): a liquid from plants that you use in cooking | loc: олія
  EN TS: The oil is pouring slowly.
  ua TS: Олія ллється повільно.
  EN FS: The milk is pouring slowly.
  ua FS: Молоко ллється повільно.
  EN TP: bread in olive oil
  ua TP: хліб в оливковій олії
  EN FP: oil in a frying pan
  ua FP: олія на сковорідці
511 | onion (noun): a round vegetable that makes your eyes water | loc: цибуля
  EN TS: He is cutting onions in swim goggles. Genius!
  ua TS: Він ріже цибулю в окулярах для плавання. Геній!
  EN FS: He is cutting onions in sunglasses. Genius!
  ua FS: Він ріже цибулю в сонцезахисних окулярах. Геній!
  EN TP: chopping a white onion
  ua TP: нарізати білу цибулю
  EN FP: frying a white onion
  ua FP: смажити білу цибулю
512 | outfit (noun): the set of clothes worn together | loc: образ
  EN TS: The outfit finally works.
  ua TS: Образ нарешті вдався.
  EN FS: The haircut finally works.
  ua FS: Зачіска нарешті вдалася.
  EN TP: putting together an outfit
  ua TP: складати образ
  EN FP: an outfit for a wedding
  ua FP: образ на весілля
513 | outside (adverb): not inside a building, out in the open air | loc: надворі
  EN TS: They are eating outside. Who needs a dining room?
  ua TS: Вони їдять надворі. Кому потрібна їдальня?
  EN FS: They are eating inside. Who needs a dining room?
  ua FS: Вони їдять у хаті. Кому потрібна їдальня?
  EN TP: eating outside on the grass
  ua TP: їсти надворі на траві
  EN FP: eating outside at a cafe
  ua FP: їсти надворі в кафе
514 | oven (noun): a hot box in a kitchen for baking and roasting | loc: духовка
  EN TS: The oven is their new TV.
  ua TS: Духовка — їхній новий телик.
  EN FS: The fridge is their new TV.
  ua FS: Холодильник — їхній новий телик.
  EN TP: bread rising in the oven
  ua TP: хліб підходить у духовці
  EN FP: pizza in the oven
  ua FP: піца в духовці
515 | overcome (verb): to succeed against something that holds you back | loc: подолати
  EN TS: She overcame the wall!
  ua TS: Вона подолала стіну!
  EN FS: She overcame the river!
  ua FS: Вона подолала річку!
  EN TP: overcoming a climbing wall
  ua TP: подолати скеледром
  EN FP: overcoming a fear of dogs
  ua FP: подолати страх собак
516 | overflow (verb): when liquid rises over the edge and spills out | loc: переливатися
  EN TS: The sink overflowed. Oops.
  ua TS: Вода переливається через раковину. Упс.
  EN FS: The bath overflowed. Oops.
  ua FS: Вода переливається через ванну. Упс.
  EN TP: an overflowing sink
  ua TP: вода переливається з раковини
  EN FP: an overflowing bin
  ua FP: переповнений смітник
517 | overtake (verb): to pass a slower vehicle and get ahead | loc: обганяти
  EN TS: Bye, camper! He's overtaking!
  ua TS: Бувай, кемпере! Він обганяє!
  EN FS: Bye, camper! He's parking!
  ua FS: Бувай, кемпере! Він паркується!
  EN TP: overtaking a slow camper
  ua TP: обганяти повільний кемпер
  EN FP: overtaking a fast train
  ua FP: обганяти швидкий потяг
518 | owl (noun): a round-faced bird that hunts at night | loc: сова
  EN TS: The owl is watching you.
  ua TS: Сова стежить за тобою.
  EN FS: The crow is watching you.
  ua FS: Ворона стежить за тобою.
  EN TP: an owl on a branch
  ua TP: сова на гілці
  EN FP: an owl in a cage
  ua FP: сова в клітці
519 | pack (verb): to put things into a bag or box to take along | loc: пакувати | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The bag is packed for school.
  ua TS: Рюкзак спаковано до школи.
  EN FS: The bag is packed for a trip.
  ua FS: Рюкзак спаковано в подорож.
  EN TP: packing a school bag
  ua TP: пакувати шкільний рюкзак
  EN FP: packing a suitcase
  ua FP: пакувати валізу
520 | paddle (verb): to move a boat by pulling a flat oar | loc: веслувати
  EN TS: She's paddling, he's sleeping.
  ua TS: Вона веслує, а він спить.
  EN FS: She's paddling, he's fishing.
  ua FS: Вона веслує, а він рибалить.
  EN TP: paddling a canoe
  ua TP: веслувати на каное
  EN FP: paddling a surfboard
  ua FP: веслувати на серфі
521 | pain (noun): the feeling you have when your body is hurt | loc: біль
  EN TS: His toe is in serious pain!
  ua TS: У пальці на нозі — жахливий біль!
  EN FS: His hand is in serious pain!
  ua FS: У руці — жахливий біль!
  EN TP: pain in the toe
  ua TP: біль у пальці ноги
  EN FP: pain in the back
  ua FP: біль у спині
522 | painting (noun): making a picture with a brush and colours | loc: картина
  EN TS: Her painting is better than the real view, she says.
  ua TS: Її картина краща за справжній краєвид, каже вона.
  EN FS: Her painting is worse than the real view, she says.
  ua FS: Її картина гірша за справжній краєвид, каже вона.
  EN TP: painting the sea
  ua TP: малювати море
  EN FP: painting a wall white
  ua FP: фарбувати стіну в білий
523 | pan (noun): a flat metal pot with a handle for frying | loc: сковорідка
  EN TS: Nice moves with that frying pan!
  ua TS: Класні рухи зі сковорідкою!
  EN FS: Nice moves with that pizza dough!
  ua FS: Класні рухи з тістом для піци!
  EN TP: vegetables in a frying pan
  ua TP: овочі на сковорідці
  EN FP: pancakes in a frying pan
  ua FP: млинці на сковорідці
524 | panic (noun): a sudden strong fear that stops you acting calmly | loc: паніка
  EN TS: Panic mode: the train left without her!
  ua TS: Паніка: потяг поїхав без неї!
  EN FS: Panic mode: the bus left without her!
  ua FS: Паніка: автобус поїхав без неї!
  EN TP: panic on the platform
  ua TP: паніка на пероні
  EN FP: panic on the plane
  ua FP: паніка в літаку
525 | paperclip (noun): a bent wire that holds sheets together | loc: скріпка
  EN TS: One little paperclip is beating the big fan.
  ua TS: Одна маленька скріпка перемагає великий вентилятор.
  EN FS: One little stapler is beating the big fan.
  ua FS: Один маленький степлер перемагає великий вентилятор.
  EN TP: a paperclip on the papers
  ua TP: скріпка на паперах
  EN FP: a paperclip holding a photo
  ua FP: скріпка тримає фото
526 | paralyze (verb): to make someone unable to move at all | loc: паралізувати
  EN TS: The ray gun paralyzed him!
  ua TS: Променева гармата його паралізувала!
  EN FS: The water gun paralyzed him!
  ua FS: Водяний пістолет його паралізував!
  EN TP: paralyzed by a ray gun
  ua TP: паралізований променевою гарматою
  EN FP: paralyzed by fear
  ua FP: паралізований страхом
527 | parcel (noun): a box or package sent by post | loc: посилка
  EN TS: She got a parcel!
  ua TS: Їй прийшла посилка!
  EN FS: She got a letter!
  ua FS: Їй прийшов лист!
  EN TP: opening a parcel
  ua TP: відкривати посилку
  EN FP: sending a parcel
  ua FP: надсилати посилку
528 | park (verb): to stop a car and leave it in a place | loc: паркувати
  EN TS: She is parking like a pro!
  ua TS: Вона паркується як профі!
  EN FS: He is parking like a pro!
  ua FS: Він паркується як профі!
  EN TP: to park between two cars
  ua TP: паркуватися між двома машинами
  EN FP: to park in a garage
  ua FP: паркуватися в гаражі
530 | parrot (noun): a bright tropical bird with a curved beak | loc: папуга
  EN TS: The parrot is saying hello.
  ua TS: Папуга каже «привіт».
  EN FS: The parrot is saying goodbye.
  ua FS: Папуга каже «бувай».
  EN TP: a parrot on a railing
  ua TP: папуга на поручні
  EN FP: a parrot in a cage
  ua FP: папуга в клітці
531 | party (noun): a get-together where people eat, drink and dance | loc: вечірка
  EN TS: This garden party is lit.
  ua TS: Ця вечірка в саду — вогонь.
  EN FS: This pool party is lit.
  ua FS: Ця вечірка біля басейну — вогонь.
  EN TP: a garden party at sunset
  ua TP: вечірка в саду на заході сонця
  EN FP: a pool party
  ua FP: вечірка біля басейну
532 | pass (verb): to kick or throw a ball to someone on your team | loc: пасувати | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He passed, she scored, easy.
  ua TS: Він пасує, вона забиває — легко.
  EN FS: She passed, he scored, easy.
  ua FS: Вона пасує, він забиває — легко.
  EN TP: passing the ball to her
  ua TP: пасувати м'яч їй
  EN FP: passing a slow car
  ua FP: обганяти повільну машину
533 | passport (noun): an official book you show when you travel abroad | loc: паспорт
  EN TS: She kissed her passport!
  ua TS: Вона поцілувала свій паспорт!
  EN FS: She kissed her suitcase!
  ua FS: Вона поцілувала свою валізу!
  EN TP: a stamped passport
  ua TP: паспорт зі штампами
  EN FP: a passport photo booth
  ua FP: фотобудка для паспорта
535 | pasta (noun): an Italian food made from flour, water and eggs | loc: паста
  EN TS: The pasta tower looks professional.
  ua TS: Вежа з пасти виглядає професійно.
  EN FS: The cake tower looks professional.
  ua FS: Вежа з тістечок виглядає професійно.
  EN TP: a tower of pasta
  ua TP: вежа з пасти
  EN FP: pasta in a salad
  ua FP: паста в салаті
536 | peace (noun): a calm, quiet feeling with no stress | loc: спокій
  EN TS: She finds peace in a hammock.
  ua TS: Вона знаходить спокій у гамаку.
  EN FS: She finds peace in a bathtub.
  ua FS: Вона знаходить спокій у ванні.
  EN TP: peace at sunrise
  ua TP: спокій на світанку
  EN FP: peace at midnight
  ua FP: спокій опівночі
537 | peel (verb): to take the skin off fruit or vegetables | loc: чистити
  EN TS: She is peeling a red apple.
  ua TS: Вона чистить червоне яблуко.
  EN FS: She is peeling a green apple.
  ua FS: Вона чистить зелене яблуко.
  EN TP: to peel in one spiral
  ua TP: чистити однією спіраллю
  EN FP: to peel a banana
  ua FP: чистити банан
538 | pen (noun): a thin tool you write with in ink | loc: ручка
  EN TS: His pen has many colours.
  ua TS: У його ручки купа кольорів.
  EN FS: His pen has one colour.
  ua FS: У його ручки лише один колір.
  EN TP: a pen with many colours
  ua TP: багатоколірна ручка
  EN FP: a pen with a light
  ua FP: ручка з ліхтариком
540 | penalty (noun): a free kick at goal given after a foul | loc: пенальті
  EN TS: She scored the penalty!
  ua TS: Вона забила пенальті!
  EN FS: She missed the penalty!
  ua FS: Вона не забила пенальті!
  EN TP: scoring a penalty
  ua TP: забити пенальті
  EN FP: saving a penalty
  ua FP: відбити пенальті
541 | pencil (noun): a thin wooden tool you write or draw with | loc: олівець | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Her pencil drawing is so good.
  ua TS: Її малюнок олівцем такий гарний.
  EN FS: Her pen drawing is so good.
  ua FS: Її малюнок ручкою такий гарний.
  EN TP: drawing with a yellow pencil
  ua TP: малювати жовтим олівцем
  EN FP: sharpening a yellow pencil
  ua FP: стругати жовтий олівець
542 | penguin (noun): a black and white bird that swims but cannot fly | loc: пінгвін
  EN TS: Belly slide! Go, penguin!
  ua TS: Ковзання на пузі! Вперед, пінгвіне!
  EN FS: Belly slide! Go, seal!
  ua FS: Ковзання на пузі! Вперед, тюленю!
  EN TP: a penguin on the ice
  ua TP: пінгвін на льоду
  EN FP: a penguin in a zoo
  ua FP: пінгвін у зоопарку
543 | pepper (noun): a hot-tasting powder from ground black seeds | loc: перець | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The pepper made him sneeze!
  ua TS: Від перцю він чхнув!
  EN FS: The onion made him sneeze!
  ua FS: Від цибулі він чхнув!
  EN TP: grinding black pepper
  ua TP: молоти чорний перець
  EN FP: grinding coffee beans
  ua FP: молоти кавові зерна
545 | performance (noun): a show performed in front of an audience | loc: виступ
  EN TS: What a juggling performance!
  ua TS: Оце жонглерський виступ!
  EN FS: What a dance performance!
  ua FS: Оце танцювальний виступ!
  EN TP: a street juggling performance
  ua TP: вуличний виступ із жонглюванням
  EN FP: a school exam performance
  ua FP: виступ на шкільному іспиті
546 | perfume (noun): a liquid with a nice smell you put on your skin | loc: парфуми
  EN TS: That is way too much perfume!
  ua TS: Це вже забагато парфумів!
  EN FS: That is way too much water!
  ua FS: Це вже забагато води!
  EN TP: spraying perfume on a friend
  ua TP: бризкати парфумами на подругу
  EN FP: spraying perfume on a dress
  ua FP: бризкати парфумами на сукню
547 | phone (noun): a device you use to call and talk to people | loc: телефон
  EN TS: Her phone is ringing!
  ua TS: У неї дзвонить телефон!
  EN FS: Her doorbell is ringing!
  ua FS: У неї дзвонить дверний дзвінок!
  EN TP: answering the phone
  ua TP: відповідати по телефону
  EN FP: a phone in a pocket
  ua FP: телефон у кишені
548 | photography (noun): the activity of taking pictures with a camera | loc: фотографія
  EN TS: That one! Photography is fun.
  ua TS: Оцей кадр! Фотографія — це кайф.
  EN FS: That one! Painting is fun.
  ua FS: Оцей кадр! Живопис — це кайф.
  EN TP: street photography at sunset
  ua TP: вулична фотографія на заході сонця
  EN FP: wedding photography indoors
  ua FP: весільна фотографія в приміщенні
549 | piercing (noun): a small hole in the ear for wearing jewelry | loc: пірсинг
  EN TS: A gold hoop for her piercing.
  ua TS: Золоте кільце для її пірсингу.
  EN FS: A gold stud for her piercing.
  ua FS: Золотий гвоздик для її пірсингу.
  EN TP: a gold hoop piercing
  ua TP: пірсинг із золотим кільцем
  EN FP: a piercing in her nose
  ua FP: пірсинг у носі
550 | pig (noun): a pink farm animal with a flat nose and short legs | loc: свиня
  EN TS: The pig is rolling in the mud.
  ua TS: Свиня валяється в багнюці.
  EN FS: The pig is rolling in snow.
  ua FS: Свиня валяється в снігу.
  EN TP: a pig in a farmyard
  ua TP: свиня на подвір'ї
  EN FP: a pig in a bathtub
  ua FP: свиня у ванні
551 | pigeon (noun): a grey city bird that walks and pecks at crumbs | loc: голуб
  EN TS: The pigeon is inspecting the cafe.
  ua TS: Голуб інспектує кафе.
  EN FS: The pigeon is inspecting the bank.
  ua FS: Голуб інспектує банк.
  EN TP: a pigeon on a square
  ua TP: голуб на площі
  EN FP: a pigeon in a park
  ua FP: голуб у парку
553 | pitch (noun): the grass field where football is played | loc: поле
  EN TS: He is so proud of his pitch.
  ua TS: Він так пишається своїм полем.
  EN FS: He is so proud of his car.
  ua FS: Він так пишається своєю машиною.
  EN TP: mowing the pitch
  ua TP: косити поле
  EN FP: painting the pitch
  ua FP: фарбувати поле
554 | place (noun): a spot or area where you can be | loc: місце
  EN TS: Perfect place on the beach.
  ua TS: Ідеальне місце на пляжі.
  EN FS: Perfect place in the park.
  ua FS: Ідеальне місце в парку.
  EN TP: the perfect place to sit
  ua TP: ідеальне місце, щоб посидіти
  EN FP: a place in the queue
  ua FP: місце в черзі
555 | plant (noun): a living green thing that grows in soil | loc: рослина
  EN TS: The plant has a new leaf!
  ua TS: У рослини новий листок!
  EN FS: The plant has a new flower!
  ua FS: У рослини нова квітка!
  EN TP: a plant with big leaves
  ua TP: рослина з великим листям
  EN FP: a plant with red flowers
  ua FP: рослина з червоними квітами
556 | plaster (noun): a small sticky strip that covers a cut | loc: пластир
  EN TS: He saved her life with a plaster.
  ua TS: Він урятував їй життя пластирем.
  EN FS: He saved her life with some ice.
  ua FS: Він урятував їй життя шматочком льоду.
  EN TP: a plaster on a fingertip
  ua TP: пластир на кінчику пальця
  EN FP: plaster on a wall
  ua FP: штукатурка на стіні
557 | plate (noun): a flat round dish you eat food from | loc: тарілка
  EN TS: The chef is serving the plate.
  ua TS: Шеф подає тарілку.
  EN FS: The chef is washing the plate.
  ua FS: Шеф миє тарілку.
  EN TP: spaghetti on a white plate
  ua TP: спагеті на білій тарілці
  EN FP: a stack of empty plates
  ua FP: стос порожніх тарілок
558 | play (verb): to take part in a game or sport | loc: грати
  EN TS: He lost his hat playing volleyball.
  ua TS: Він загубив капелюх, граючи у волейбол.
  EN FS: He lost his shoe playing volleyball.
  ua FS: Він загубив черевик, граючи у волейбол.
  EN TP: playing volleyball in a park
  ua TP: грати у волейбол у парку
  EN FP: playing cards in a park
  ua FP: грати в карти в парку
559 | player (noun): a person who takes part in a game or sport | loc: гравець
  EN TS: This player is so happy!
  ua TS: Цей гравець такий щасливий!
  EN FS: This player is so angry!
  ua FS: Цей гравець такий злий!
  EN TP: a player in yellow
  ua TP: гравець у жовтому
  EN FP: a player on the bench
  ua FP: гравець на лаві запасних
560 | fountain (noun): a structure that shoots water into the air | loc: фонтан
  EN TS: Selfie first, fountain second.
  ua TS: Спершу селфі, потім фонтан.
  EN FS: Selfie first, pizza second.
  ua FS: Спершу селфі, потім піца.
  EN TP: the famous Trevi Fountain
  ua TP: знаменитий фонтан Треві
  EN FP: a fountain in a mall
  ua FP: фонтан у торговому центрі
561 | pleasure (noun): a feeling of enjoyment and delight | loc: насолода
  EN TS: A croissant of pure pleasure.
  ua TS: Круасан — чиста насолода.
  EN FS: A bagel of pure pleasure.
  ua FS: Бейгл — чиста насолода.
  EN TP: the pleasure of a croissant
  ua TP: насолода від круасана
  EN FP: a pleasure to meet you
  ua FP: приємно познайомитися
562 | plug (noun): the end of a cable you push into a socket | loc: вилка
  EN TS: The plug was the problem.
  ua TS: Проблема була у вилці.
  EN FS: The bulb was the problem.
  ua FS: Проблема була в лампочці.
  EN TP: a loose plug
  ua TP: вилка, що хитається
  EN FP: a bath plug
  ua FP: пробка для ванни
563 | pocket (noun): a small bag sewn into clothes to keep things in | loc: кишеня
  EN TS: The keys were in his pocket!
  ua TS: Ключі були в його кишені!
  EN FS: The keys were in his shoe!
  ua FS: Ключі були в його черевику!
  EN TP: keys in a jacket pocket
  ua TP: ключі в кишені куртки
  EN FP: keys in a car door
  ua FP: ключі в дверях машини
564 | podium (noun): the three-step stand where winners stand | loc: п'єдестал
  EN TS: Their podium is made of foam.
  ua TS: Їхній п'єдестал із пінопласту.
  EN FS: Their podium is made of gold.
  ua FS: Їхній п'єдестал із золота.
  EN TP: a foam block podium
  ua TP: п'єдестал із поролонових блоків
  EN FP: a podium at a conference
  ua FP: трибуна на конференції
565 | politics (noun): the activity of elections and governing | loc: політика
  EN TS: In this politics game, orange won.
  ua TS: У цій грі в політику виграв помаранчевий.
  EN FS: In this politics game, green won.
  ua FS: У цій грі в політику виграв зелений.
  EN TP: politics in the town square
  ua TP: політика на міській площі
  EN FP: politics on TV
  ua FP: політика по телевізору
566 | pollute (verb): to make water or air dirty and harmful | loc: забруднювати
  EN TS: He is polluting the river. Shame!
  ua TS: Він забруднює річку. Ганьба!
  EN FS: He is cleaning the river. Shame!
  ua FS: Він чистить річку. Ганьба!
  EN TP: to pollute a clean river
  ua TP: забруднювати чисту річку
  EN FP: to pollute the sea
  ua FP: забруднювати море
567 | pond (noun): a small area of still water | loc: ставок
  EN TS: Goldfish live in this pond.
  ua TS: У цьому ставку живуть золоті рибки.
  EN FS: Frogs live in this pond.
  ua FS: У цьому ставку живуть жаби.
  EN TP: goldfish in the pond
  ua TP: золоті рибки у ставку
  EN FP: ducks on the pond
  ua FP: качки на ставку
568 | pool (noun): a big tank of water that you swim in | loc: басейн
  EN TS: She wanted a quiet day at the pool.
  ua TS: Вона хотіла тихий день біля басейну.
  EN FS: She wanted a quiet day at the lake.
  ua FS: Вона хотіла тихий день біля озера.
  EN TP: splashing into the pool
  ua TP: плюхнутися в басейн
  EN FP: a pool table
  ua FP: більярдний стіл
569 | postmaster (noun): the person in charge of a post office | loc: начальник пошти
  EN TS: The postmaster is very bossy.
  ua TS: Начальник пошти дуже владний.
  EN FS: The postmaster is very shy.
  ua FS: Начальник пошти дуже сором'язливий.
  EN TP: a bossy postmaster
  ua TP: владний начальник пошти
  EN FP: a postmaster on holiday
  ua FP: начальник пошти у відпустці
571 | pot (noun): a deep round container for cooking | loc: каструля
  EN TS: The pot water is dancing!
  ua TS: Вода в каструлі танцює!
  EN FS: The pot water is freezing!
  ua FS: Вода в каструлі замерзає!
  EN TP: potatoes in a big pot
  ua TP: картопля у великій каструлі
  EN FP: flowers in a big pot
  ua FP: квіти у великому горщику
572 | potato (noun): a round vegetable that grows under the ground | loc: картопля
  EN TS: They found a lot of potatoes!
  ua TS: Вони накопали купу картоплі!
  EN FS: They found a lot of carrots!
  ua FS: Вони накопали купу моркви!
  EN TP: digging up potatoes
  ua TP: копати картоплю
  EN FP: peeling potatoes
  ua FP: чистити картоплю
573 | pouring (noun): making a liquid flow out of a container | loc: наливання
  EN TS: His pouring shows real skill.
  ua TS: Його наливання — справжня майстерність.
  EN FS: His singing shows real skill.
  ua FS: Його спів — справжня майстерність.
  EN TP: pouring from up high
  ua TP: наливання з висоти
  EN FP: pouring rain outside
  ua FP: злива надворі
574 | powder (noun): a very fine dry dust, like flour or makeup | loc: пудра
  EN TS: What a cloud of powder!
  ua TS: Оце хмара пудри!
  EN FS: What a cloud of smoke!
  ua FS: Оце хмара диму!
  EN TP: brushing on face powder
  ua TP: наносити пудру пензликом
  EN FP: baking with white powder
  ua FP: випічка з білим порошком
575 | power bank (noun): a portable battery you carry to charge your phone | loc: павербанк
  EN TS: Her power bank saved the day!
  ua TS: Її павербанк урятував ситуацію!
  EN FS: His power bank saved the day!
  ua FS: Його павербанк урятував ситуацію!
  EN TP: charging from a power bank
  ua TP: заряджатися від павербанка
  EN FP: a power bank at home
  ua FP: павербанк удома
576 | pray (verb): to speak to a god | loc: молитися
  EN TS: She prays for a good grade.
  ua TS: Вона молиться за хорошу оцінку.
  EN FS: She prays for a new phone.
  ua FS: Вона молиться за новий телефон.
  EN TP: praying for a good grade
  ua TP: молитися за хорошу оцінку
  EN FP: praying in a church
  ua FP: молитися в церкві
577 | predict (verb): to say what will happen before it happens | loc: передбачити
  EN TS: She predicted the rain. He didn't.
  ua TS: Вона передбачила дощ. А він — ні.
  EN FS: She predicted the snow. He didn't.
  ua FS: Вона передбачила сніг. А він — ні.
  EN TP: predicting the rain
  ua TP: передбачити дощ
  EN FP: predicting the lottery numbers
  ua FP: передбачити номери лотереї
578 | pride (noun): the good feeling about something you did well | loc: гордість | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is beaming with pride.
  ua TS: Вона сяє від гордості.
  EN FS: She is crying with pride.
  ua FS: Вона плаче від гордості.
  EN TP: pride in her motorbike
  ua TP: гордість за свій мотоцикл
  EN FP: pride in her new car
  ua FP: гордість за нову машину
579 | programming (noun): writing code that tells a computer what to do | loc: програмування
  EN TS: Programming a robot is hard.
  ua TS: Програмування робота — це складно.
  EN FS: Programming a drone is hard.
  ua FS: Програмування дрона — це складно.
  EN TP: programming a small robot
  ua TP: програмування маленького робота
  EN FP: programming a video game
  ua FP: програмування відеогри
580 | protect (verb): to keep someone or something safe from harm | loc: захищати
  EN TS: She is protecting her from the rain.
  ua TS: Вона захищає її від дощу.
  EN FS: She is protecting her from the sun.
  ua FS: Вона захищає її від сонця.
  EN TP: protecting someone from rain
  ua TP: захищати когось від дощу
  EN FP: protecting someone from a dog
  ua FP: захищати когось від собаки
581 | protesting (noun): marching with signs to demand a change | loc: протестувати
  EN TS: Protesting with sunflowers!
  ua TS: Протестують із соняшниками!
  EN FS: Protesting with umbrellas!
  ua FS: Протестують із парасольками!
  EN TP: protesting for nature
  ua TP: протестувати за природу
  EN FP: protesting in the rain
  ua FP: протестувати під дощем
582 | proud (adjective): pleased and happy about something you did | loc: гордий
  EN TS: She is proud of her chair.
  ua TS: Вона горда своїм стільцем.
  EN FS: She is proud of her table.
  ua FS: Вона горда своїм столом.
  EN TP: proud of her work
  ua TP: горда своєю роботою
  EN FP: proud of her car
  ua FP: горда своєю машиною
584 | prove (verb): to show that something is true by demonstrating it | loc: довести | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She proved him wrong. Easy.
  ua TS: Вона довела, що він помиляється. Легко.
  EN FS: He proved her wrong. Easy.
  ua FS: Він довів, що вона помиляється. Легко.
  EN TP: proving him wrong
  ua TP: довести, що він не правий
  EN FP: proving her wrong
  ua FP: довести, що вона не права
585 | public (adjective): open to everyone, not private | loc: публічний
  EN TS: She is playing music in public.
  ua TS: Вона грає музику в публічному місці.
  EN FS: She is playing chess in public.
  ua FS: Вона грає в шахи в публічному місці.
  EN TP: playing music in public
  ua TP: музика в публічному місці
  EN FP: a public swimming pool
  ua FP: публічний басейн
587 | puck (noun): the hard black disc used in ice hockey | loc: шайба
  EN TS: Yellow scored with the puck!
  ua TS: Жовті закинули шайбу!
  EN FS: Purple scored with the puck!
  ua FS: Фіолетові закинули шайбу!
  EN TP: a puck in the net
  ua TP: шайба в сітці
  EN FP: a puck in the stands
  ua FP: шайба на трибуні
588 | puddle (noun): a small pool of rain water on the ground | loc: калюжа
  EN TS: Splash! A big puddle jump.
  ua TS: Бульк! Мегастрибок у калюжу.
  EN FS: Splash! A big pool jump.
  ua FS: Бульк! Мегастрибок у басейн.
  EN TP: jumping into a puddle
  ua TP: стрибнути в калюжу
  EN FP: stepping around a puddle
  ua FP: обійти калюжу
589 | pulling (noun): the act of moving something toward you with force | loc: тягнення
  EN TS: Hard pulling, happy ending.
  ua TS: Важке тягнення, щасливий кінець.
  EN FS: Hard pushing, happy ending.
  ua FS: Важке штовхання, щасливий кінець.
  EN TP: pulling on a thick rope
  ua TP: тягнення товстого канату
  EN FP: pulling a door open
  ua FP: відчиняти двері на себе
590 | punch (verb): to hit something hard with your fist | loc: вдарити кулаком
  EN TS: She is punching like a pro!
  ua TS: Вона б'є кулаком як профі!
  EN FS: She is kicking like a pro!
  ua FS: Вона б'є ногою як профі!
  EN TP: punching the focus pads
  ua TP: бити кулаком по лапах
  EN FP: punching the wall
  ua FP: бити кулаком у стіну
591 | punching bag (noun): a heavy hanging bag that boxers hit | loc: боксерська груша
  EN TS: He's in love with his punching bag.
  ua TS: Він закоханий у свою боксерську грушу.
  EN FS: He's in love with his garage ladder.
  ua FS: Він закоханий у свою драбину з гаража.
  EN TP: hanging a punching bag
  ua TP: вішати боксерську грушу
  EN FP: punching the garage door
  ua FP: бити по дверях гаража
592 | pushing (noun): the act of moving something away from you | loc: штовхання
  EN TS: Pushing a van? Easy!
  ua TS: Штовхання фургона? Легко!
  EN FS: Pushing a bus? Easy!
  ua FS: Штовхання автобуса? Легко!
  EN TP: pushing a white van
  ua TP: штовхання білого фургона
  EN FP: pushing a white car
  ua FP: штовхання білої машини
593 | pyjamas (noun): loose soft clothes you wear in bed | loc: піжама
  EN TS: Matching pyjamas? So cute!
  ua TS: Однакові піжами? Як мило!
  EN FS: Matching jackets? So cute!
  ua FS: Однакові куртки? Як мило!
  EN TP: matching checked pyjamas
  ua TP: однакові піжами в клітинку
  EN FP: matching striped pyjamas
  ua FP: однакові смугасті піжами
594 | qualify (verb): to reach the standard to go through | loc: кваліфікуватися
  EN TS: The jump qualified her.
  ua TS: Завдяки стрибку вона кваліфікувалася.
  EN FS: The swim qualified her.
  ua FS: Завдяки запливу вона кваліфікувалася.
  EN TP: qualifying for the next round
  ua TP: кваліфікуватися в наступний раунд
  EN FP: qualifying as a doctor
  ua FP: отримати кваліфікацію лікаря
595 | rabbit (noun): a small animal with long ears and a fluffy tail | loc: кролик
  EN TS: The rabbit is sitting up.
  ua TS: Кролик сидить стовпчиком.
  EN FS: The rabbit is lying down.
  ua FS: Кролик лежить.
  EN TP: a rabbit in the dunes
  ua TP: кролик у дюнах
  EN FP: a rabbit in a hat
  ua FP: кролик у капелюсі
596 | race (noun): a contest to see who is fastest | loc: забіг
  EN TS: Go, go, go! What a race!
  ua TS: Вперед, вперед! Оце забіг!
  EN FS: Go, go, go! What a swim!
  ua FS: Вперед, вперед! Оце заплив!
  EN TP: a race on a track
  ua TP: забіг на доріжці
  EN FP: a race in a pool
  ua FP: заплив у басейні
597 | racket (noun): a bat with strings for hitting a ball | loc: ракетка
  EN TS: Cool trick with the racket.
  ua TS: Класний трюк з ракеткою.
  EN FS: Cool trick with the bottle.
  ua FS: Класний трюк з пляшкою.
  EN TP: a black tennis racket
  ua TP: чорна тенісна ракетка
  EN FP: a racket for badminton
  ua FP: ракетка для бадмінтону
598 | rain (noun): water that falls from clouds in drops | loc: дощ
  EN TS: She is dancing in the rain.
  ua TS: Вона танцює під дощем.
  EN FS: She is dancing in the snow.
  ua FS: Вона танцює під снігом.
  EN TP: dancing in heavy rain
  ua TP: танцювати під сильним дощем
  EN FP: hiding from the rain
  ua FP: ховатися від дощу
599 | rapid (adjective): very fast; happening at great speed | loc: швидкий
  EN TS: These moves are super rapid.
  ua TS: Ці рухи — просто шалено швидкі.
  EN FS: These moves are super slow.
  ua FS: Ці рухи — просто шалено повільні.
  EN TP: rapid stepovers
  ua TP: швидкі переступи
  EN FP: rapid passes
  ua FP: швидкі паси
600 | rat (noun): an animal like a big mouse with a long tail | loc: пацюк
  EN TS: The rat is stealing pizza!
  ua TS: Пацюк краде піцу!
  EN FS: The rat is stealing bread!
  ua FS: Пацюк краде хліб!
  EN TP: a rat with pizza
  ua TP: пацюк із піцою
  EN FP: a rat in a cage
  ua FP: пацюк у клітці
601 | razor (noun): a sharp tool for cutting hair off your skin | loc: бритва
  EN TS: He is shaving with a razor.
  ua TS: Він голиться бритвою.
  EN FS: He is shaving with a knife.
  ua FS: Він голиться ножем.
  EN TP: an electric razor
  ua TP: електрична бритва
  EN FP: a razor blade
  ua FP: лезо бритви
602 | reading (noun): the activity of looking at and taking in text | loc: читання
  EN TS: Reading on a train at night.
  ua TS: Читання в потязі вночі.
  EN FS: Reading on a boat at night.
  ua FS: Читання на човні вночі.
  EN TP: reading on a night train
  ua TP: читання в нічному потязі
  EN FP: reading in a library
  ua FP: читання в бібліотеці
604 | receipt (noun): a piece of paper that shows what you paid | loc: чек
  EN TS: This receipt never ends!
  ua TS: Цей чек ніколи не закінчиться!
  EN FS: This menu never ends!
  ua FS: Це меню ніколи не закінчиться!
  EN TP: a very long receipt
  ua TP: дуже довгий чек
  EN FP: a very short receipt
  ua FP: дуже короткий чек
606 | recipe (noun): a set of steps that tells you how to cook a dish | loc: рецепт
  EN TS: The recipe says: eggs first.
  ua TS: Рецепт каже: спершу яйця.
  EN FS: The recipe says: fish first.
  ua FS: Рецепт каже: спершу риба.
  EN TP: a hand-drawn recipe card
  ua TP: рецепт, намальований від руки
  EN FP: a recipe for soup
  ua FP: рецепт супу
607 | refrigerator (noun): a cold box in the kitchen that keeps food fresh | loc: холодильник
  EN TS: The refrigerator is full now.
  ua TS: Холодильник тепер повний.
  EN FS: The oven is full now.
  ua FS: Духовка тепер повна.
  EN TP: filling the refrigerator
  ua TP: заповнювати холодильник
  EN FP: cleaning the refrigerator
  ua FP: мити холодильник
608 | relief (noun): the good feeling when stress is finally over | loc: полегшення
  EN TS: Parked! What a relief!
  ua TS: Запарковано! Яке полегшення!
  EN FS: Crashed! What a relief!
  ua FS: Розбито! Яке полегшення!
  EN TP: relief after parking
  ua TP: полегшення після паркування
  EN FP: relief after a crash
  ua FP: полегшення після аварії
609 | rest (verb): to stop and sit or lie down to get energy back | loc: відпочивати
  EN TS: They are resting on the hill.
  ua TS: Вони відпочивають на пагорбі.
  EN FS: They are running on the hill.
  ua FS: Вони бігають на пагорбі.
  EN TP: resting on a hilltop
  ua TP: відпочивати на вершині пагорба
  EN FP: resting in a hammock
  ua FP: відпочивати в гамаку
610 | ribbon (noun): a narrow strip of cloth tied in a bow | loc: стрічка
  EN TS: The pumpkin got a blue ribbon. She's shocked!
  ua TS: Гарбуз отримав блакитну стрічку. Вона в шоці!
  EN FS: The carrot got a blue ribbon. She's shocked!
  ua FS: Морква отримала блакитну стрічку. Вона в шоці!
  EN TP: a pumpkin's blue ribbon
  ua TP: блакитна стрічка гарбуза
  EN FP: a ribbon in her hair
  ua FP: стрічка в її волоссі
612 | right (adverb): toward the side opposite to left | loc: праворуч
  EN TS: She is pointing to the right.
  ua TS: Вона показує праворуч.
  EN FS: She is pointing to the sky.
  ua FS: Вона показує на небо.
  EN TP: going right past the stalls
  ua TP: іти праворуч повз ятки
  EN FP: turning right at the lights
  ua FP: повернути праворуч на світлофорі
613 | ring (noun): the square area where boxers fight | loc: ринг
  EN TS: He is bouncing in the ring.
  ua TS: Він пританцьовує на рингу.
  EN FS: He is bouncing in the pool.
  ua FS: Він пританцьовує в басейні.
  EN TP: climbing into the ring
  ua TP: залазити на ринг
  EN FP: a ring on a finger
  ua FP: каблучка на пальці
615 | river (noun): a long stream of water flowing to the sea | loc: річка
  EN TS: Leaf race on the river. Go go!
  ua TS: Перегони листочків на річці. Давай-давай!
  EN FS: Boat race on the river. Go go!
  ua FS: Перегони човнів на річці. Давай-давай!
  EN TP: leaves on a clear river
  ua TP: листя на чистій річці
  EN FP: a boat on a river
  ua FP: човен на річці
616 | rock (noun): a very big hard piece of stone | loc: брила
  EN TS: Rock: one. Humans: zero.
  ua TS: Брила: один. Люди: нуль.
  EN FS: Tree: one. Humans: zero.
  ua FS: Дерево: один. Люди: нуль.
  EN TP: pushing a giant rock
  ua TP: штовхати велетенську брилу
  EN FP: throwing a small rock
  ua FP: кидати маленький камінь
617 | rollerblades (noun): boots with a line of small wheels for skating | loc: ролики
  EN TS: She came on rollerblades just to take his drink!
  ua TS: Вона приїхала на роликах, аби забрати його напій!
  EN FS: She came on a bike just to take his drink!
  ua FS: Вона приїхала на велосипеді, аби забрати його напій!
  EN TP: purple rollerblades in a park
  ua TP: фіолетові ролики в парку
  EN FP: rollerblades on an ice rink
  ua FP: ролики на ковзанці
618 | rope (noun): a thick strong cord made of twisted strands | loc: мотузка
  EN TS: The rope saved the cart!
  ua TS: Мотузка врятувала візок!
  EN FS: The chain saved the cart!
  ua FS: Ланцюг врятував візок!
  EN TP: a rope around a wheel
  ua TP: мотузка навколо колеса
  EN FP: a rope for skipping
  ua FP: мотузка для стрибків
619 | lower (verb): to move something down slowly on a rope | loc: опускати
  EN TS: She is lowering a basket.
  ua TS: Вона опускає кошик.
  EN FS: She is lowering a bucket.
  ua FS: Вона опускає відро.
  EN TP: lowering a basket by rope
  ua TP: опускати кошик на мотузці
  EN FP: lowering the volume
  ua FP: зменшувати гучність
620 | rose (noun): a flower with a sweet smell and thorns on its stem | loc: троянда
  EN TS: This rose smells like heaven.
  ua TS: Ця троянда пахне як рай.
  EN FS: This tulip smells like heaven.
  ua FS: Цей тюльпан пахне як рай.
  EN TP: smelling a pink rose
  ua TP: нюхати рожеву троянду
  EN FP: buying a pink rose
  ua FP: купувати рожеву троянду
621 | row (noun): a line of things or people next to each other | loc: ряд
  EN TS: The row is perfectly straight.
  ua TS: Ряд ідеально рівний.
  EN FS: The row is perfectly round.
  ua FS: Ряд ідеально круглий.
  EN TP: planting in a straight row
  ua TP: садити рівним рядом
  EN FP: sitting in the front row
  ua FP: сидіти в першому ряду
622 | rubber band (noun): a small stretchy loop that holds things together | loc: гумка
  EN TS: A rubber band secures herbs.
  ua TS: Гумка тримає зелень.
  EN FS: A rubber band secures leeks.
  ua FS: Гумка тримає цибулю-порей.
  EN TP: an orange rubber band
  ua TP: помаранчева гумка
  EN FP: a rubber band for hair
  ua FP: гумка для волосся
623 | rude (adjective): not polite, showing no respect for others | loc: грубий
  EN TS: What a rude guy!
  ua TS: Який грубий тип!
  EN FS: What a kind guy!
  ua FS: Який добрий тип!
  EN TP: a rude cafe customer
  ua TP: грубий відвідувач кафе
  EN FP: a rude waitress
  ua FP: груба офіціантка
624 | run (verb): to move fast on your feet | loc: бігти | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is running after her hat!
  ua TS: Вона біжить за своїм капелюхом!
  EN FS: She is running after her dog!
  ua FS: Вона біжить за своїм псом!
  EN TP: to run after a hat
  ua TP: бігти за капелюхом
  EN FP: to run after a bus
  ua FP: бігти за автобусом
626 | runner (noun): a person who races on foot | loc: бігун
  EN TS: The runner is drinking water.
  ua TS: Бігун п'є воду.
  EN FS: The runner is eating a banana.
  ua FS: Бігун їсть банан.
  EN TP: a runner drinking water
  ua TP: бігун п'є воду
  EN FP: a runner on a treadmill
  ua FP: бігун на біговій доріжці
627 | runway (noun): the long stage a model walks along | loc: подіум
  EN TS: Living room runway. Work it!
  ua TS: Подіум у вітальні. Запали!
  EN FS: Kitchen runway. Work it!
  ua FS: Подіум на кухні. Запали!
  EN TP: a living room runway
  ua TP: подіум у вітальні
  EN FP: a runway at an airport
  ua FP: злітна смуга в аеропорту
628 | sadness (noun): the feeling of being unhappy | loc: смуток
  EN TS: Her face is full of sadness.
  ua TS: Її обличчя сповнене смутку.
  EN FS: Her face is full of joy.
  ua FS: Її обличчя сповнене радості.
  EN TP: sadness in an empty shop
  ua TP: смуток у порожній крамниці
  EN FP: sadness at a funeral
  ua FP: смуток на похороні
629 | safe (adjective): protected from danger, where nothing can hurt you | loc: у безпеці
  EN TS: Safe inside, storm outside.
  ua TS: У безпеці вдома, надворі буря.
  EN FS: Safe inside, sun outside.
  ua FS: У безпеці вдома, надворі сонце.
  EN TP: safe in a mountain hut
  ua TP: у безпеці в гірській хатині
  EN FP: a safe on the wall
  ua FP: сейф на стіні
630 | sailor (noun): a person who works on a ship or boat | loc: моряк
  EN TS: The sailor is at the wheel!
  ua TS: Моряк за штурвалом!
  EN FS: The sailor is at the table!
  ua FS: Моряк за столом!
  EN TP: a sailor on deck
  ua TP: моряк на палубі
  EN FP: a sailor in a bar
  ua FP: моряк у барі
631 | salad (noun): a cold mix of raw vegetables like lettuce | loc: салат
  EN TS: He makes salads very efficiently.
  ua TS: Він робить салати дуже ефективно.
  EN FS: He makes cakes very efficiently.
  ua FS: Він робить торти дуже ефективно.
  EN TP: tossing a fresh salad
  ua TP: перемішувати свіжий салат
  EN FP: a salad in a box
  ua FP: салат у контейнері
632 | salt (noun): white crystals you add to food for flavour | loc: сіль
  EN TS: They are salting the tomatoes.
  ua TS: Вони посипають помідори сіллю.
  EN FS: They are salting the potatoes.
  ua FS: Вони посипають картоплю сіллю.
  EN TP: salt on tomato slices
  ua TP: сіль на скибочках помідора
  EN FP: salt on a snowy road
  ua FP: сіль на засніженій дорозі
634 | sand (noun): tiny grains of rock that cover beaches and deserts | loc: пісок
  EN TS: A wave ate her sand art.
  ua TS: Хвиля з'їла її малюнок на піску.
  EN FS: A dog ate her sand art.
  ua FS: Пес з'їв її малюнок на піску.
  EN TP: drawing in the sand
  ua TP: малювати на піску
  EN FP: building a sand castle
  ua FP: будувати замок із піску
635 | sandals (noun): light open shoes held on with straps | loc: сандалі
  EN TS: Sandals on, toes out!
  ua TS: Сандалі вдягнуті, пальці на волі!
  EN FS: Boots on, toes out!
  ua FS: Чоботи вдягнуті, пальці на волі!
  EN TP: buckling tan sandals
  ua TP: застібати коричневі сандалі
  EN FP: buying tan sandals
  ua FP: купувати коричневі сандалі
636 | sandwich (noun): two pieces of bread with food between them | loc: сендвіч
  EN TS: Even the duck wants that sandwich.
  ua TS: Навіть качка хоче цей сендвіч.
  EN FS: Even the dog wants that sandwich.
  ua FS: Навіть пес хоче цей сендвіч.
  EN TP: a ham and cheese sandwich
  ua TP: сендвіч із шинкою та сиром
  EN FP: a sandwich in a lunchbox
  ua FP: сендвіч у ланч-боксі
637 | pomegranate (noun): a round red fruit full of juicy red seeds | loc: гранат
  EN TS: A pomegranate: hundreds of seeds.
  ua TS: Гранат: сотні зернят.
  EN FS: A watermelon: hundreds of seeds.
  ua FS: Кавун: сотні зернят.
  EN TP: opening a pomegranate
  ua TP: розкривати гранат
  EN FP: pomegranate juice in a glass
  ua FP: гранатовий сік у склянці
638 | sauce (noun): a thick liquid you pour over food for flavour | loc: соус
  EN TS: He used way too much sauce!
  ua TS: Він переборщив із соусом!
  EN FS: He used way too much salt!
  ua FS: Він переборщив із сіллю!
  EN TP: a plate full of sauce
  ua TP: тарілка, повна соусу
  EN FP: sauce in a bottle
  ua FP: соус у пляшці
639 | sausage (noun): minced meat pressed into a long thin skin | loc: ковбаска
  EN TS: He is frying sausages.
  ua TS: Він смажить ковбаски.
  EN FS: He is frying eggs.
  ua FS: Він смажить яйця.
  EN TP: frying sausages in a pan
  ua TP: смажити ковбаски на сковорідці
  EN FP: sausages on a pizza
  ua FP: ковбаски на піці
640 | scale (noun): a device for weighing things | loc: ваги
  EN TS: The scale must be broken!
  ua TS: Ваги, мабуть, зламалися!
  EN FS: The clock must be broken!
  ua FS: Годинник, мабуть, зламався!
  EN TP: a big dial scale
  ua TP: великі ваги з циферблатом
  EN FP: a kitchen scale
  ua FP: кухонні ваги
641 | scale (noun): a device for weighing things | loc: ваги
  EN TS: The cat is on the scale!
  ua TS: Кіт на вагах!
  EN FS: The dog is on the scale!
  ua FS: Пес на вагах!
  EN TP: a cat on the scale
  ua TP: кіт на вагах
  EN FP: a pay scale at work
  ua FP: шкала зарплат на роботі
642 | scar (noun): a permanent mark on the skin from a healed wound | loc: шрам
  EN TS: They are comparing scars.
  ua TS: Вони порівнюють шрами.
  EN FS: They are comparing tattoos.
  ua FS: Вони порівнюють татуювання.
  EN TP: comparing their scars
  ua TP: порівнювати свої шрами
  EN FP: hiding their scars
  ua FP: ховати свої шрами
644 | scared (adjective): afraid, feeling fear | loc: переляканий
  EN TS: Who's there? She is scared!
  ua TS: Хто там? Вона перелякана!
  EN FS: Who's there? He is scared!
  ua FS: Хто там? Він переляканий!
  EN TP: scared in a parking garage
  ua TP: перелякана в підземному паркінгу
  EN FP: scared on a roller coaster
  ua FP: перелякана на американських гірках
645 | schedule (noun): a plan of the things you must do and when | loc: розклад
  EN TS: He is organising his schedule.
  ua TS: Він упорядковує свій розклад.
  EN FS: He is organising his desk.
  ua FS: Він упорядковує свій стіл.
  EN TP: planning a schedule
  ua TP: планувати розклад
  EN FP: a bus schedule
  ua FP: розклад автобусів
646 | science (noun): the study of how nature and the world work | loc: наука
  EN TS: Science makes orange foam!
  ua TS: Наука робить помаранчеву піну!
  EN FS: Science makes blue foam!
  ua FS: Наука робить синю піну!
  EN TP: a science experiment
  ua TP: науковий експеримент
  EN FP: a science museum
  ua FP: науковий музей
647 | scissors (noun): a tool with two sharp blades that open and close | loc: ножиці
  EN TS: Just a trim with the scissors.
  ua TS: Лише трохи підрівняти ножицями.
  EN FS: Just a trim with the razor.
  ua FS: Лише трохи підрівняти бритвою.
  EN TP: cutting bangs with scissors
  ua TP: стригти чубчик ножицями
  EN FP: cutting paper with scissors
  ua FP: різати папір ножицями
649 | scold (verb): to angrily tell someone off for a mistake | loc: сварити
  EN TS: Grandma is scolding him again.
  ua TS: Бабуся знову його сварить.
  EN FS: Grandma is hugging him again.
  ua FS: Бабуся знову його обіймає.
  EN TP: to scold a grandson
  ua TP: сварити онука
  EN FP: to scold a dog
  ua FP: сварити собаку
650 | screw (noun): a threaded metal pin you turn into wood | loc: шуруп
  EN TS: He found the last screw!
  ua TS: Він знайшов останній шуруп!
  EN FS: He found the last nail!
  ua FS: Він знайшов останній цвях!
  EN TP: the last missing screw
  ua TP: останній загублений шуруп
  EN FP: the last missing sock
  ua FP: остання загублена шкарпетка
651 | screwdriver (noun): a hand tool with a shaped tip for turning screws | loc: викрутка
  EN TS: She's using the screwdriver, he's worrying.
  ua TS: Вона працює викруткою, а він хвилюється.
  EN FS: She's using the hammer, he's worrying.
  ua FS: Вона працює молотком, а він хвилюється.
  EN TP: tightening with a screwdriver
  ua TP: закручувати викруткою
  EN FP: a screwdriver in his hand
  ua FP: викрутка в його руці
652 | sea (noun): the huge area of salty water that covers the earth | loc: море
  EN TS: Ew! The sea is salty!
  ua TS: Фу! Море солоне!
  EN FS: Ew! The lake is salty!
  ua FS: Фу! Озеро солоне!
  EN TP: jumping into the sea
  ua TP: стрибати в море
  EN FP: a sea of people
  ua FP: море людей
653 | searching (noun): the act of looking carefully for something | loc: шукати
  EN TS: So much searching! The keys were in the door.
  ua TS: Стільки шукати! А ключі були в дверях.
  EN FS: So much searching! The keys were in the car.
  ua FS: Стільки шукати! А ключі були в машині.
  EN TP: searching for lost keys
  ua TP: шукати загублені ключі
  EN FP: searching for a lost dog
  ua FP: шукати загубленого пса
654 | secret (noun): something you know but must not tell others | loc: таємниця
  EN TS: She is whispering a secret.
  ua TS: Вона шепоче таємницю.
  EN FS: She is shouting a secret.
  ua FS: Вона вигукує таємницю.
  EN TP: to whisper a secret
  ua TP: шепотіти таємницю
  EN FP: to write a secret
  ua FP: записати таємницю
655 | serious (adjective): not laughing or joking, calm and thoughtful | loc: серйозний
  EN TS: Party hats? She stays serious.
  ua TS: Святкові ковпаки? А вона серйозна.
  EN FS: Party hats? He stays serious.
  ua FS: Святкові ковпаки? А він серйозний.
  EN TP: a serious face at work
  ua TP: серйозне обличчя на роботі
  EN FP: a serious talk at dinner
  ua FP: серйозна розмова за вечерею
656 | distract (verb): to take someone's attention away from their task | loc: відволікати
  EN TS: The whole crowd can't distract her!
  ua TS: Навіть цілий натовп не може її відволікти!
  EN FS: The whole crowd can't distract him!
  ua FS: Навіть цілий натовп не може його відволікти!
  EN TP: trying to distract her
  ua TP: намагатися її відволікти
  EN FP: trying to distract a dog
  ua FP: намагатися відволікти собаку
657 | serve (verb): to bring food or drinks to someone at a table | loc: подавати | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She serves noodles like a pro.
  ua TS: Вона подає локшину як профі.
  EN FS: She serves pizza like a pro.
  ua FS: Вона подає піцу як профі.
  EN TP: to serve a noodle bowl
  ua TP: подавати миску локшини
  EN FP: to serve a tennis ball
  ua FP: подавати тенісний м'яч
659 | shampoo (noun): a liquid soap for washing your hair | loc: шампунь
  EN TS: That is a lot of shampoo!
  ua TS: Оце так багато шампуню!
  EN FS: That is a lot of cream!
  ua FS: Оце так багато крему!
  EN TP: a tower of shampoo foam
  ua TP: вежа з піни від шампуню
  EN FP: a shampoo for dogs
  ua FP: шампунь для собак
660 | basin (noun): a wide round bowl you fill with water for washing | loc: таз
  EN TS: Who needs a salon? A basin works.
  ua TS: Кому потрібен салон? Є таз.
  EN FS: Who needs a salon? A bucket works.
  ua FS: Кому потрібен салон? Є відро.
  EN TP: washing hair over a basin
  ua TP: мити голову над тазом
  EN FP: washing dishes in a basin
  ua FP: мити посуд у тазу
661 | shark (noun): a big ocean fish with rows of pointed teeth | loc: акула
  EN TS: The shark is smiling at you.
  ua TS: Акула тобі всміхається.
  EN FS: The dolphin is smiling at you.
  ua FS: Дельфін тобі всміхається.
  EN TP: a shark near the camera
  ua TP: акула біля камери
  EN FP: a shark near a boat
  ua FP: акула біля човна
662 | sharpener (noun): a small tool that gives a pencil a sharp point | loc: стругачка
  EN TS: The sharpener works perfectly.
  ua TS: Стругачка працює ідеально.
  EN FS: The sharpener works badly.
  ua FS: Стругачка працює погано.
  EN TP: a small pencil sharpener
  ua TP: маленька стругачка для олівців
  EN FP: a small knife sharpener
  ua FP: маленька точилка для ножів
663 | shaving foam (noun): a white cream you put on before using a razor | loc: піна для гоління
  EN TS: Shaving foam: instant beard!
  ua TS: Піна для гоління: миттєва борода!
  EN FS: Shaving foam: instant hat!
  ua FS: Піна для гоління: миттєва шапка!
  EN TP: a swirl of shaving foam
  ua TP: завиток піни для гоління
  EN FP: shaving foam on a cake
  ua FP: піна для гоління на торті
664 | shaving (noun): cutting hair off your face with a blade | loc: голитися
  EN TS: Shaving by hand, old school.
  ua TS: Голитися вручну — олдскул.
  EN FS: Waxing by hand, old school.
  ua FS: Робити воскову депіляцію вручну — олдскул.
  EN TP: shaving with a straight razor
  ua TP: голитися небезпечною бритвою
  EN FP: shaving with an electric razor
  ua FP: голитися електробритвою
665 | sheep (noun): a farm animal with thick wool that says baa | loc: вівця
  EN TS: Is the sheep angry at me?
  ua TS: Вівця на мене сердиться?
  EN FS: Is the goat angry at me?
  ua FS: Коза на мене сердиться?
  EN TP: a sheep on a hillside
  ua TP: вівця на схилі пагорба
  EN FP: a sheep in a barn
  ua FP: вівця в сараї
666 | shirt (noun): a piece of clothing with buttons and a collar | loc: сорочка
  EN TS: He is putting on a blue shirt.
  ua TS: Він вдягає блакитну сорочку.
  EN FS: He is putting on a red shirt.
  ua FS: Він вдягає червону сорочку.
  EN TP: buttoning a light-blue shirt
  ua TP: застібати світло-блакитну сорочку
  EN FP: ironing a light-blue shirt
  ua FP: прасувати світло-блакитну сорочку
667 | shock (noun): the sudden upset when something bad surprises you | loc: шок
  EN TS: The fallen scooter is a shock.
  ua TS: Самокат упав — це шок.
  EN FS: The fallen bike is a shock.
  ua FS: Велосипед упав — це шок.
  EN TP: shock over a fallen scooter
  ua TP: шок через перекинутий самокат
  EN FP: an electric shock
  ua FP: удар струмом
668 | shoes (noun): things you wear on your feet over socks | loc: черевики
  EN TS: Shoes laced. Ready to go.
  ua TS: Черевики зашнуровано. Можна йти.
  EN FS: Boots laced. Ready to go.
  ua FS: Чоботи зашнуровано. Можна йти.
  EN TP: lacing up brown shoes
  ua TP: шнурувати коричневі черевики
  EN FP: polishing brown shoes
  ua FP: чистити коричневі черевики
669 | shop (noun): a building or room where you buy things | loc: крамниця
  EN TS: Three coins buy a lot in this shop.
  ua TS: У цій крамниці на три монети можна купити купу всього.
  EN FS: Ten coins buy a lot in this shop.
  ua FS: У цій крамниці на десять монет можна купити купу всього.
  EN TP: a little grocery shop
  ua TP: маленька продуктова крамниця
  EN FP: a little flower shop
  ua FP: маленька квіткова крамниця
670 | shopping (noun): buying things in stores | loc: купувати | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Her shopping is efficient.
  ua TS: Вона купує все дуже ефективно.
  EN FS: Her swimming is efficient.
  ua FS: Вона плаває дуже ефективно.
  EN TP: shopping at the supermarket
  ua TP: купувати в супермаркеті
  EN FP: shopping for clothes
  ua FP: купувати одяг
671 | shouting (noun): calling out in a very loud voice | loc: кричати
  EN TS: Too much shouting, sore throats.
  ua TS: Кричали забагато — тепер болить горло.
  EN FS: Too much singing, sore throats.
  ua FS: Співали забагато — тепер болить горло.
  EN TP: shouting across a valley
  ua TP: кричати через долину
  EN FP: shouting at the TV
  ua FP: кричати на телевізор
672 | showering (noun): washing your body under falling water | loc: приймати душ
  EN TS: Showering in ice water!
  ua TS: Приймати душ у крижаній воді!
  EN FS: Showering in hot water!
  ua FS: Приймати душ у гарячій воді!
  EN TP: showering at the beach
  ua TP: приймати душ на пляжі
  EN FP: showering in a bathroom
  ua FP: приймати душ у ванній
